


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Government Money Fund (PRRXX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Government Money Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				PRRXX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments








			
				Formerly T. Rowe Price Prime Reserve Fund
				
				
				
			
			


 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/27/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
							$1.0000
						  
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
							$0.0000
						  
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/27/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								0.19%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
							
								$1.0000
							
							-
							
								$1.0000
							
						  
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$7,879.79

					
					Million
				



Important money market information: Click here for NAV Type, Liquidity Fees & Redemption Gates, Daily & Weekly liquid asset levels, Holdings, Market-based NAV and Net Shareholder flows.

						Effective August 1, 2016, Prime Reserve Fund, changed to a government mandate and was 
renamed Government Money Fund. The performance for the periods prior to August 1, 2016 
reflects the performance of the fund when it operated as a prime money market fund and 
invested in certain types of securities that it is no longer permitted to hold. 
Performance prior to this conversion may have been different if the current investment 
limitations had been in effect.
						




Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions


Average Annual Total Returns 1



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					0.16%
				
			

				
					0.16%
				
			


3 Years

				
					0.06%
				
			

				
					0.06%
				
			


5 Years

				
					0.04%
				
			

				
					0.04%
				
			


10 Years

				
					0.53%
				
			

				
					0.53%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 4.88%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							4.88%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							January 26, 1976
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.48%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.44%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, 
which cannot guarantee future results. Return and yield will vary.

 
    
You could lose money by investing in the Fund. 
Although the Fund seeks to preserve the value of your investment at $1.00 per share, it cannot guarantee 
it will do so. An investment in the Fund is not insured or guaranteed by the 
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. The Fund's 
sponsor has no legal obligation to provide financial support to the Fund, and 
you should not expect that the sponsor will provide financial support to the 
Fund at any time.
    
    





^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

1Average annual total return figures include reinvested dividends and capital gain distributions.
		



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund's goals are preservation of capital, liquidity, and, consistent with these, the highest possible current income.
		
7-Day Annualized Yield2
 as of 
				
				    07/27/2017
				
			



Simple3

						 
							0.64%
						
					


Simple w/o Waiver

						 
							0.46%
						
					


Compound3

						 
							0.64%
						
					


Compound w/o Waiver

						 
							0.46%
						
					



2
								
				
				A method of calculating a money fund's yield by annualizing the 
fund's net investment income for the last seven days of each period 
divided by the fund's net asset value at the end of the period. 
				
3
									
					
					In an effort to maintain a zero or positive net yield for the fund, T. Rowe Price has voluntarily waived all or a portion of the management fee it is entitled to receive from the fund. A fee waiver has the effect of increasing the fund's net yield. The 7-day yield without waiver represents what the yield would have been if we were not waiving our management fee. This voluntary waiver is in addition to any contractual expense ratio limitation in effect for the fund and may be amended or terminated at any time without prior notice. Please see the prospectus for more details. 
					
				
				Year-to-date figures are not annualized and represent total return, 
which includes reinvested distributions (income and capital gains) 
and any change in share price for the given period. The yield quotation 
more closely reflects the current earnings of the money market fund than the total return quotation.
			


























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual  fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Thu Jul 27 22:50:48 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- & 5-Star Rated Funds | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now





































Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















85% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 6/30/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Personal Finance





Summer 2017 Issue: T. Rowe Price Report

July 20, 2017









Personal Finance





Top 10 Financial To-Dos for Recent College Grads

July 19, 2017









Fixed Income





Finding Opportunities in High Yield Markets

July 18, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*157 of our 332 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 134 of these 157 (85%) funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 215 of 317 (68%), 183 of 225 (81%), 149 of 180 (83%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
36 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes). 34 of these 36 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 38 of 39, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 162 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 6/30/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari














404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                









 








About Us | PGIMInvestments



















About Us
www.pgim.com


en


QkLe_GigTmQIHsEJZhaNJm2

Asset Management


Skip to main content















 PGIM.com


 PGIM Businesses






 Financial Professional Login


 Customer Login


 Careers


 Contact













Menu



Close






PGIM Home







About Us
 About Us


 Products


 Insights


 Overview


 Fixed Income


 Income Investing




 Resources






Close














{}








Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRJVO5







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 






































We help investors participate in global market opportunities
At PGIM Investments, we consider it a great privilege and responsibility to help investors participate in opportunities across global markets while meeting their toughest investment challenges. We’re part of PGIM, the 9th-largest investment manager globally1 with more than $1 trillion in assets under management.2



















































 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB0S0







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























		
			PGIM Investments At a Glance
		
	
Through our diversified fund line up and consistent outperformance, PGIM Investments ranks among the top five fastest organically growing U.S. mutual fund firms.3












 


Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB0U4







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 










































80% of z-class funds outperformed their Morningstar category median over the 10-year period ended March 31, 2017.4






























90% of our fixed income funds outperformed their Morningstar category median over their 10-year period.5






























We offer a diversified suite of actively managed funds across a broad spectrum of asset classes and investment styles.























 


Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBGO3







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























		
			Bringing You the Investment Managers of Prudential
		
	
We are part of PGIM, the global investment management business of Prudential Financial, a company that individuals and businesses have trusted with their financial future for over 140 years.












 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBGQ5







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 








































PGIM is the 9th largest asset manager in the world1


Manages assets for 142 of the top 300 Global Pension Funds6


Manages assets for 18 of the largest 25 public U.S. Pension Plans7 




























More than $1 trillion in assets under management2


Manages assets for 23 of the largest 25 corporate U.S. Pension Plans7


Global presence with offices in 16 countries2

























 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBG71







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























		
			Focused on Delivering Long-term Results
		
	












 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB846







AdvisorFundTrackerTable



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 













    Our Top Performing Funds
      





Morningstar Overall Ratings for Class Z shares as of {{fundDate}}


Fund Name
OVERALL RATING
3-YEAR
5-YEAR
10-YEAR




{{fund.fundName}}opens in a new window ({{fund.code}})
               Rating: ({{fund.category}})


{{fund.overallRating}} star fund rating 


{{fund.overallFunds}} Funds
 -



{{fund.3yearRating}} star fund rating 


 {{fund.3yearFunds}} Funds
 -



{{fund.5yearRating}} star fund rating 


 {{fund.5yearFunds}} Funds
 -



{{fund.10yearRating}} star fund rating 


 {{fund.10yearFunds}} Funds
 -











 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB845







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























Meet the Managers Behind our Star Performing Funds

Our asset managers are committed to a long-term approach to investing. That’s because they also manage money for major corporations and pension funds around the world who measure investment success over decades, not quarters. It means individual investors benefit from the same focus, expertise, innovation, and attention to risk demanded by today’s most sophisticated investors. PGIM assets under management data as of 3/31/2017.












 

Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVH4L7







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 


































One of the largest and most experienced fixed-income managers in the industry.
 




Assets
$653.6 Billion


Established
1928












Global leader in public and private real estate investments with deep knowledge of local and regional markets.




Assets
$65.9 Billion


Established
1970












Leading fundamental equity manager featuring growth, value, blend, global and specialty strategies.




Assets
$164.3 Billion


Established
1969












Leader in developing innovative equity and asset allocation strategies to help meet a broad range of investment objectives.




Assets
$120.5 Billion


Established
1975
















Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVHCT7







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























					
					
						Recent Awards & Recognition
					
				












	
		LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Utility Fund (Class Z)


















LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Utility Fund (Class Z)







#1 Utility Fund (Class Z)
Prudential Jennison Utility Fund is recognized as a 2017 Lipper Fund Award winner for leading the utility category over the 5-year period
















	
		ALERIAN  MLP Mutual Fund of the Year


















ALERIAN  MLP Mutual Fund of the Year







MLP Mutual Fund of the Year
Prudential Jennison MLP Fund is recognized as a 2017 Ammy Award winner for being the MLP mutual fund that generated the highest total return of 17 funds in 2016.

















	
		LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Income Fund (Class Z)


















LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Income Fund (Class Z)







#1 Global Income Fund (Class Z)
Prudential Global Total Return Fund, Inc. is recognized as a 2016 Lipper Fund Award winner for leading the global income category over the 10-year period.
















	
		LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z)


















LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z)







#1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z)
Prudential Global Real Estate Fund is recognized as a 2016 Lipper Fund Award winner for leading the global real estate category over the 10-year period.

















































































 

Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVH2M7







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























Spotlight













 

Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVH2L3







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 


























	
	
		What's New
	
	













 
			
			
				What's New
			 
		






Check out our new Family of Funds Brochure featuring PGIM Investments' key attributes, investment experience, and diversified suite of funds.








 Download the Family of Funds Brochure  PDF opens in a new window









	
	
		The Active/Passive Choice
	
	













 
			
			
				The Active/Passive Choice
			 
		






As passive management gains traction, what is the impact on investors?  Richard Woodworth, VP Product Management explains why choice is good for investors.














	
	
		Newsroom
	
	













 
			
			
				Newsroom
			 
		






View our latest press releases and announcements.








 Read the latest PGIM Investments News 


















 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBKS3







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 













1. Pensions & Investments: Largest Money Manager list, May 2017, data as of 12/31/2016.
2. PGIM data, as of 3/31/17.
3. Simfund, as of 3/31/17 among top 50 competitors between 2008 and 1Q2017, excludes ETFs and money market funds.
4. 28 out of 35 funds. Ranking based on Class Z share funds with 10-year history. Rankings for Class Z share funds that rank top 50% or better within their respective Morningstar Categories over the trailing 1-, 3-, & 5-year periods are 31/56 funds, 29/48 funds, and 25/42 funds, respectively. Source: Morningstar as of 3/31/17.
5. 9 out of 10 fixed income funds. Ranking based on Class Z share fixed income funds with 10-year history. Rankings for Class Z share fixed income funds that rank top 50% or better within their respective Morningstar Categories over the trailing 1-, 3-, & 5-year periods are 12/18 funds, 14/15 funds, and 11/13 funds, respectively. Source: Morningstar as of 3/31/17.
6. P&I/Towers Watson Top 300 Pension Funds ranking as of 12/31/16, published 9/30/16.
7. Based on U.S. Plan Sponsor rankings in Pensions & Investments as of 12/31/16.
Morningstar rankings are based on total return, do not include the effects of sales charges, and are calculated against all funds in each fund's respective Morningstar category. Past performance does not guarantee future results. Performance by share class may vary.
Star ratings shown are for Class Z shares, which are available to individual investors through certain retirement and wrap fee programs, and to institutions at an investment minimum of $5,000,000. Performance by share class may vary. In addition to the ones shown above, other classes, which contain either a sales load or a contingent deferred sales charge, are also available. These expenses will generally lower total fund return. Please see the prospectus for additional information about fees, expenses and investor eligibility requirements.
The risks associated with investing in these funds include but are not limited to: derivative securities, which may carry market, credit, and liquidity risks; short sales, which involve costs and the risk of potentially unlimited losses; leveraging, which may magnify losses; high yield (“junk”) bonds, which are subject to greater market risks; small/mid cap stocks which may be subject to more erratic market movements than large cap stocks; foreign securities, which are subject to currency fluctuation and political uncertainty; real estate, which poses certain risks related to overall and specific economic conditions as well as risks related to individual property, credit and interest-rate fluctuations; and mortgage-backed securities, which are subject to prepayment and extension risks. Sector funds and Specialty funds may not be suitable for all investors. Such funds are non-diversified, so a loss resulting from a particular security will have greater impact on the Fund's return. Fixed income investments are subject to interest rate risk, and their value will decline as interest rates rise. The risks associated with each fund are explained more fully in each fund's respective prospectus. There is no guarantee a fund's objectives will be achieved.
Some Morningstar Ratings may not be customarily based on adjusted historical returns. If so, an investment's independent Morningstar Rating metric is compared against the retail mutual fund universe breakpoints to determine its hypothetical rating for certain time periods. The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.
For the overall, 3-, 5- and 10-year periods, respectively, as of 3/31/17: Prudential Balanced Fund was rated 5 stars out of 721 funds, 5 stars out of 721 funds, and 5 stars out of 616 funds, and 4 out of 424 funds, respectively; Prudential High Yield Fund was rated 5 stars out of 596 funds, 5 stars out of 596 funds, 4 stars out of 471 funds, and 5 stars out of 318 funds, respectively; Prudential Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund, Inc. was rated 5 stars out of 444 funds, 4 stars out of 444 funds, 4 stars out of 359 funds, and 5 stars out of 257 funds, respectively; Prudential Total Return Bond Fund was rated 5 stars out of 851 funds, 5 stars out of 851 funds, 5 stars out of 750 funds, and 5 stars out of 538 funds, respectively; Prudential California Municipal Income Fund was rated 5 stars out of 69 funds, 5 stars out of 69 funds, 5 stars out of 65 funds, and 5 stars out of 52 funds, respectively; Prudential National Muni Fund was rated 5 stars out of 256 funds, 5 stars out of 256 funds, 5 stars out of 224 funds, and 5 stars out of 150 funds, respectively; Prudential QMA Small-Cap Value Fund was rated 5 stars out of 353 funds, 5 stars out of 353 funds, 4 stars out of 309 funds, and 5 stars out of 199 funds, respectively; Prudential Short Duration Multi-Sector Bond Fund was rated 5 stars out of 444 funds, and 5 stars out of 444 funds, respectively.
© 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All rights reserved. The information contained herein (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete, or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information.
In the Lipper Fund Awards, funds had to be registered for sale in the respective country as of the end of 2015 and 2016 and the fund had to have at least 36 months of performance history as of the end of the evaluation year. S&P 500 Index funds, specialty diversified equity funds and specialty/miscellaneous funds were not eligible to receive classification awards. Rankings do not take sales charges into account. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
The Lipper Fund Awards are based on risk-adjusted returns for the three-, five-, and 10-year periods ending 11/30/2015 and 11/30/2016 using Lipper's proprietary, quantitative fund rating methodology.
The Lipper Fund Awards are based on risk-adjusted returns for the three-, five-, and 10-year periods ending 11/30/2016 using Lipper's proprietary, quantitative fund rating methodology. Prudential Jennison Utility Fund- #1 Utility Fund (Class Z) out of 47 funds for the 5-year period ended 11/30/2016. Rankings for the 3- and 10-year periods were 16 out of 49 and 16 out of 44 funds, respectively. Prudential Global Total Return - #1 Global Income Fund (Class Z) out of 76 funds for the 10-year period ended 11/30/2015. Rankings for the 3- and 5-year periods were 72 out of 182 and 28 out of 130 funds, respectively. Prudential Global Real Estate Fund: #1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z) out of 32 funds for the 10-year period ended 11/30/2015. Rankings for the 3- and 5-year periods were 40 out of 113 and 20 out of 94 funds, respectively.
From Thomson Reuters Lipper Awards, © 2017 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Used by permission and protected by the Copyright Laws of the United States. The printing, copying, redistribution, or retransmission of this Content without express written permission is prohibited.
The Ammys 2017 MLP Mutual Fund of the Year Award. Awarded to the MLP mutual fund that generated the highest total return of 17 funds in 2016. MLP mutual fund is defined as a mutual fund whose principal investment objective is to invest the majority of fund assets in MLPs, and by definition, making a corporate tax election. Total return is calculated using the fund’s Class A shares, adding any dividends paid during the year to the price return. As a viability threshold, the fund must have at least $100 million in assets. Leveraged versions of other mutual funds are not eligible. There are a total of 17 MLP mutual funds in the peer group, one of which was ineligible for utilizing leverage.
Alerian and its affiliates do not endorse, manage, promote, sell, or sponsor any company, investment fund or other vehicle nominated, selected as a finalist, or selected as a winner for the Alerian MLP Awards, or Ammys. Alerian is not an investment advisor, and Alerian and its affiliates make no representations regarding the advisability of investing in any company, investment fund or other vehicle nominated, selected as a finalist, or selected as a winner for the Ammys.
Consider a fund's investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. The prospectus Opens in a new window and the summary prospectus contain this and other information about the fund. Contact your financial professional for a prospectus and the summary prospectus. Read them carefully before investing.
An investment in our money market funds is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. Although the funds seek to preserve the value of your clients investment at $1.00 per share, it is possible to lose money by investing in the funds.
Mutual fund investing involves risk. Some mutual funds have more risk than others. The investment return and principal value will fluctuate and investor's shares when sold may be worth more or less than the original cost. Fixed income investments are subject to interest rate risk, and their value will decline as interest rates rise. Asset allocation and diversification do not assure a profit or protect against loss in declining markets. There is no guarantee a Fund's objectives will be achieved. The risks associated with each fund are explained more fully in each fund's respective prospectus. Your clients should consult with their attorney, accountant, and/or tax professional for advice concerning their particular situation.
These materials are for informational or educational purposes only. The information is not intended as investment advice and is not a recommendation about managing or investing your retirement savings. In providing these materials PGIM Investments is not acting as your fiduciary as defined by the Department of Labor. Please consult with a qualified investment professional if you wish to obtain investment advice.
Mutual funds are distributed by Prudential Investment Management Services LLC, a Prudential Financial company, member SIPC. Jennison Associates and PGIM, Inc. (PGIM) are registered investment advisors and Prudential Financial companies. QMA is the primary business name of Quantitative Management Associates LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of PGIM. PGIM Fixed Income and PGIM Real Estate are units of PGIM. © 2017 Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Jennison Associates, Jennison, PGIM Real Estate, the Prudential logo, and the Rock symbol are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide.
Prudential Financial, Inc. of the United States is not affiliated with Prudential plc. which is headquartered in the United Kingdom.
Investment Products: Are not insured by the FDIC or any other federal government agency, may lose value, and are not a deposit of or guaranteed by any bank or any bank affiliate.
 
0303656-00003-00 Ed. 06/2017
 









 






Back to top

















 













Capital One 360 Money Market® Page








































Please Use Javascript
JavaScript must be enabled on your browser for your web experience to work as designed or to log in to your account. Please use your browser's Help function to learn how to enable JavaScript.Learn more about JavaScript enabled browsers our sites support.

















    360 Money Market®
  










Here, savings don't just grow. They break through.







        With 360 Money Market®, an online & mobile account from Capital One®, you'll earn up to % Annual Percentage Yield. That's one of the nation's best savings rates.
      






      
        Open Now
      
    







Strong savings. Enduring growth.





One of the nation's top rates
Earn % APY on balances of  or more. (Balances of less than  will still earn a great everyday rate of % APY.)





No fees, all growth
With no fees, your money stays on the rise.





Safe and secure
FDIC insurance* and fraud coverage will keep your savings secure.







Give your money the upward push it deserves with 360 Money Market®.






      
        Open Now
      
    









Questions? Give us a buzz at 1-800-289-1992 to talk to a real person (8 a.m. - 8 p.m., 7 days a week).
Advertised rates are variable and effective . The % Annual Percentage Yield (APY) applies to the entire account balance for accounts with balances of  or more; a % APY applies to the entire account balance for accounts with balances less than .
360 Money Market accounts do not have debit cards or check writing capabilities. Money market and savings accounts are subject to statement cycle transaction limits.
We use the daily collected balance method to calculate interest on the account. This method applies a daily periodic rate to the principal in the account each day.
There is no monthly cycle service charge for this account, and no minimum balance requirement to open or maintain the account.
National average for money market and savings accounts at top 50 banks by deposits based on balances of $1 as of 03/23/2017, Informa Research Services, Calabasas, CA, www.informars.com. Although the information has been obtained from various institutions, the accuracy cannot be guaranteed.
Web access is needed to use Mobile Banking. Check with your service provider for details on specific fees and charges.
*Please see www.fdic.gov for additional information.
Products and services offered by Capital One, N.A., Member FDIC.
© 2017 Capital One. Capital One is a federally registered service trademark. All rights reserved.








Products
Expand Products Menu


Personal Credit Cards


Business Credit Cards


Personal Banking


Small Business Banking


Commercial Banking


Home Loans


Home Equity Lines


Auto Loans


Investing


Canada


UK



About Us
Expand About Us Menu


About Capital One


Diversity & Inclusion


Financial Education


Investing for Good


Investors


Press



Careers
Expand Careers Menu


Search Jobs



Legal
Expand Legal Menu


Servicemembers Civil Relief Act


Patriot Act Cert


Subpoena Policy


ING Trademark Disclaimer


Additional Disclosures




Contact Us


Privacy


Security


Terms & Conditions


Accessibility





Twitter
Facebook
YouTube
Linked In
Instagram





Capital One
©2016 Capital One


Member FDIC
Equal Housing Lender


















Reference.com - What's Your Question

















www.reference.com































articles



                        What are money market funds?

A money market fund is an investment opportunity that typically gives its shareholders a higher return than interest from a bank, notes the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. This type of mutual fund started in the...

                        More »


www.reference.com
› Business & Finance
› Investing






                        What is the US Treasury Fund?

A U.S. Treasury Fund is a mutual fund that invests its assets in bonds, bills and notes issued by the U.S. Treasury. These securities are considered some of the safest investments on the market because they are backed by...

                        More »


www.reference.com
› Government & Politics
› US Government






                        What are monthly income funds?

An income fund is an investment plan with the purpose of returning a regular income paid out to the investor at set intervals, usually monthly or quarterly, according to Investopedia. A monthly income fund generates inco...

                        More »


www.reference.com
› Business & Finance
› Investing





Related Search


Money Market Funds Comparison


Money Market Fund Ratings


Definition Money Market Fund


Highest Money Market Rates


Difference between CD and Money Market




Best Money Market Funds


Money Market Fund List


Are Money Market Funds Safe


Explain Money Market Account


Pimco Total Return Fund





similar articles


What are some different types of investment funds?

The main types of investment funds are money market funds, bond funds and stock funds, according to Investor.gov, the investment guide maintained by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Additionally, there are ta...

                            More »


www.reference.com
› Business & Finance
› Investing





What are some types of mutual funds?

There are several different types of mutual funds, including stock funds, target date funds, bond funds and money market funds, as reported by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). Stock funds may also be kn...

                            More »


www.reference.com
› Business & Finance
› Investing





What are U.S. savings bonds?

A U.S. savings bond is an investment option from the federal government for which individuals pay face value and earn interest, according to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. The U.S. government essentially bo...

                            More »


www.reference.com
› Business & Finance
› Investing





How are prices set in an investment fund?

Since there are many types of investment fund such as mutual funds, exchange-traded funds, hedge funds and money market funds, the pricing depends on the fund itself and current market conditions. For example, mutual fun...

                            More »


www.reference.com
› Business & Finance
› Investing














Related Search


Money Market Funds Comparison


Best Money Market Funds


Money Market Fund Ratings


Money Market Fund List


Definition Money Market Fund


Are Money Market Funds Safe


Highest Money Market Rates


Explain Money Market Account





Today's Top 10 Articles in business-finance







What causes stock market prices to fluctuate?









What time does the NASDAQ open?









What is a good ROI percentage?









How do you get started investing in foreign currency?









Why is investing important?
















Privacy


Terms


Contact


Sitemap


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC





















Vehicles | Reference.com









































www.reference.com
































Vehicles




Q:

Do jetpacks exist?



A:
There are multiple examples of functional jetpack technology, though not all of these machines make use of jet propulsion technology, and very few of them approach the functionality of those jet packs seen in science fiction or cartoons. Some real-life jet packs only make very limited flights, while others are more like machine-powered parachutes that don't have the ability to lift off from the ground independently.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Vehicles




























Airplanes & Helicopters









Q:
What are scheduled flights?


A:
A scheduled flight is a trip by airplane, glider or other aircraft that has been planned for a certain time and date. Airlines sell tickets for scheduled flights to help travelers get from one destination to another. Ticket prices for scheduled flights vary depending on the airline.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Airplanes & Helicopters












Q:
What are the chief uses of airplanes?


A:
Airplanes are mainly used for travelng and for the transportation of commodities, aid and equipment across long distances. Traveling and transporting cargo using an airplane is the fastest and, at times, the only means to reach a particular destination.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Airplanes & Helicopters












Q:
What is the name of the fastest manned aircraft?


A:
According to LiveScience, the fastest manned aircraft ever flown is the experimental X-15. As of 2013, the X-15 holds the world record for fasted speed achieved by a piloted aircraft: 4,520 miles per hour, which is 6.72 times the speed of sound.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Airplanes & Helicopters












Q:
What are the benefits of airplanes?


A:
Airplane travel allows for shorter travel times and travel efficiency; it allows people to see the world and it creates millions of jobs across the globe. The world is now global and there are no true borders thanks to air travel.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Airplanes & Helicopters












Q:
Can passengers take a razor on a plane?


A:
Rules regarding packing razors in airplane luggage depend on the type of razor in question. Disposable razors and cartridges are allowed in carry-on bags, while most other types of razor must be secured in a checked bag.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Airplanes & Helicopters












Q:
How did the airplane change people's lives?


A:
The airplane has affected human life in several areas, including the transport of goods internationally, the world of politics and meeting people from other countries. It has reduced travel time from one destination to another, affected the costs people are willing to pay for transportation, and changed the experience of traveling by offering luxuries that are not available in other modes of transportation such as vehicles, trains or boats.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Airplanes & Helicopters








See More Airplanes & Helicopters Questions









Buying & Selling









Q:
What is the average cost of used cars on eBay?


A:
Most of the used car and truck auctions on eBay are within the $10,001 to $100,000 price range, according to a query made on the site in January 2015. The search resulted in 25,000 auctions within that price range.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Buying & Selling












Q:
What is the cheapest state to buy a car in?


A:
In the United States, Oregon is the least expensive state in which to purchase a car as of 2014, while Alaska, New Hampshire, Montana and Hawaii follow close behind. The price of car ownership includes several factors, such as state and local taxes, the cost of state registration and dealer documentation fees.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Buying & Selling












Q:
How do you get cash for junk cars?


A:
Several businesses pay cash for junk cars, including Pick-n-Pull and US Junk Cars. Both vendors arrange a deal with the seller. Then, they either pick up the car or wait for the seller to drop it off.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Buying & Selling












Q:
How do I purchase a car at auction?


A:
According to Edmunds, one of the best ways to purchase a car at auction is to first build a relationship with other buyers and auctioneers. This helps build a group of buyers that are willing to look out for one another, and even slow down bidding for an inexperienced buyer.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Buying & Selling












Q:
What is the best time of year to buy a new car?


A:
Winter is the best time to buy a new car, according to United Services Automobile Association, known as USAA. Winter months often offer the highest potential for discounts, notes USAA. Dealerships must clear inventory in order to make room for the newest car models, explains USAA.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Buying & Selling












Q:
How much did a new car cost in 1933?


A:
According to the website TheCostOfLiving.com, the average car cost $605 in 1933. Because of inflation, however, a dollar was worth far more in 1933 than it is today, so the cost was roughly equivalent to $10,214 in 2010 dollars.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Buying & Selling








See More Buying & Selling Questions









Car Makes & Models









Q:
What are some of the best cars for college students?


A:
Money Crashers lists the best cars for college students as the Nissan Versa, Hyundai Accent, Smart ForTwo, Chevrolet Aveo, Kia Rio and Toyota Yaris. Other cars on the list include the Kia Soul, Suzuki SX4, Hyundai Elantra and Kia Forte. The cars were chosen for their affordability, reliability and sensibility.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Makes & Models












Q:
Who makes Volvo cars?


A:
Volvo Car Corporation is a Swedish premium automobile manufacturer headquartered in Gothenburg, Sweden. As of 2014, Zhejiang Geely Holding Group of China owns the company.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Makes & Models












Q:
Is a Ferrari faster than a Lamborghini?


A:
The super-car comparison site TwinRev.com reports the Lamborghini is faster than the Ferrari. The site offers detailed, side-by-side information on the performance of both legendary Italian cars.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Makes & Models












Q:
Can you tow an automatic car?


A:
It is entirely possible to tow a vehicle with an automatic transmission, but there are some restrictions to be aware of. Thankfully, there are a variety of different ways around these problems, simply depending on the nature of the vehicle itself.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Makes & Models












Q:
What is the average weight of a car?


A:
According to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the average vehicle weighed 3,977 pounds in 2012. This is a decrease of 150 pounds compared to 2011.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Makes & Models












Q:
How many gallons does a semi truck hold?


A:
Semi truck fuel tanks vary in size, but they hold an average of 125 to 300 gallons of fuel. There is a fuel tank located on each side of the tractor, and fuel is distributed between the two tanks to balance weight.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Makes & Models








See More Car Makes & Models Questions









Car Parts & Maintenance









Q:
When did unleaded gas start?


A:
Unleaded gasoline began in 1974. Lead began to be added to gasoline in the 1920s to reduce knocking or pinging within internal combustion engines. Due to the harmful effects of leaded gasoline on people's health as well as its negative environmental impact, leaded gasoline was phased out.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Parts & Maintenance












Q:
How do you get smog certification for a car?


A:
Smog certifications for a car can be obtained by taking the car to a service station authorized to run an emissions test and grant a certification. These stations are typically found by checking with the department of motor vehicles for the state. Smog inspections are also often required when a vehicle changes ownership.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Parts & Maintenance












Q:
How do you properly adjust your vehicle's headlights?


A:
To properly adjust your vehicle's headlights, locate the adjusting screws, check the suspension and the centerlines of the headlights. You need a Phillips-head screwdriver and some masking tape for this task. The adjustment must be done after dark and takes about 15 minutes.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Parts & Maintenance












Q:
What happens when a car runs out of gas?


A:
Many times, a vehicle acts differently when it is about to run out of gas. Common signs include sputtering or shaking when the fuel level is very low. Ultimately, a car that runs out of fuel ceases to function, leaving the driver stranded until fuel is added to the tank. In addition, when a car runs out of gas, there is an increased risk of having the fuel pump fail.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Parts & Maintenance












Q:
How do you know if you need to jump a car battery or replace it?


A:
The best way to know when to replace an automobile battery is to have it tested at an automotive repair shop or auto parts store. This process should be a part of the routine maintenance of the vehicle at every oil change, according to HowStuffWorks. If the vehicle requires jump starting, it is best to drive to a shop that offers battery testing and have technicians check the battery.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Parts & Maintenance












Q:
What is the average mileage put on a car each year?


A:
In the United States, the average driver puts in between 13,476 and 15,000 miles per year on a vehicle. These statistics may vary from year to year, however.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Car Parts & Maintenance








See More Car Parts & Maintenance Questions
















Explore Vehicles



Airplanes & Helicopters




Buying & Selling




Car Makes & Models




Car Parts & Maintenance




DMV & Records







                EXPLORE OTHER CATEGORIES
            


Art & Literature


Beauty & Fashion


Business & Finance


Education




Family


Food


Geography


Government & Politics




Health


History


Hobbies & Games


Holidays & Celebrations




Home & Garden


Math


Pets & Animals


Science




Sports & Active Lifestyle


Technology


Vehicles


World View









Privacy


Terms


Contact


Sitemap


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC






















Health | Reference.com









































www.reference.com
































Health




Q:

How many fruits and veggies should you eat per day?



A:
According to a study conducted by the University College London, people need to eat 10 servings of fruits and vegetables per day in order to maintain optimal health and ward off premature death. The World Health Organization advises that eating five servings per day of fruits and vegetables is adequate.  


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Nutritional Content




























Conditions & Diseases









Q:
What causes flushed red cheeks?


A:
Flushed cheeks and an overall flushed complexion can be caused by many things, including eating spicy foods, emotional triggers and various skin conditions. One of these skin conditions is called rosacea, and it can cause swelling, redness, acne and a flushed complexion.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Conditions & Diseases












Q:
What causes a collapsed gallbladder?


A:
A gallbladder may collapse due to a condition called chronic cholecystitis, which inflames and shrinks the gallbladder, according to MedlinePlus. Gallstones are a major contributing factor to repeated acute attacks of cholecystitis.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Conditions & Diseases












Q:
Can kidneys heal themselves?


A:
The Merck Manual Home Health Handbook states that human kidneys can often heal themselves from the damage caused by acute kidney failure. A full recovery of kidney function is more likely if the episode of failure lasted less than five days and no complicating factors, such as infections, are present.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Conditions & Diseases












Q:
What is the difference between a headache and a migraine?


A:
According to Healthline.com, a migraine is a headache. Migraines are highly disabling and typically only occur on one side of the head. According to the Mayo Clinic, a headache refers to pain in any area of the head, occurring on one side of the head or both sides.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Conditions & Diseases












Q:
What are the symptoms of pneumonia?


A:
According to WebMD, symptoms of pneumonia include a cough that may produce green or slightly red mucus, fever, chills, fast breathing, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, fast heartbeat and chest pain when breathing in. The symptoms associated with pneumonia come very quickly when caused by bacteria. However, in other causes, the symptoms usually build slowly.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Conditions & Diseases












Q:
How long does walking pneumonia last?


A:
With treatment, the symptoms of walking pneumonia are alleviated within two weeks, according to Nemours. It also may take up to six weeks for walking pneumonia to resolve.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Conditions & Diseases








See More Conditions & Diseases Questions









Dental









Q:
How do you control bleeding after a tooth extraction?


A:
By applying pressure to the site of the extraction and exercising basic wound care, most people are able to stop bleeding entirely within about 24 hours following a tooth extraction. WebMD recommends additional measures to manage bleeding, reduce the risk of infection and speed up the process of recovery. If symptoms persist for longer than 24 hours, it is advisable to report them to a doctor or the oral surgeon who performed the procedure.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Dental












Q:
How long does a toothache last?


A:
A toothache can cause severe pain indefinitely if it is not treated, according to the National Health Service of Britain. A toothache typically is caused by tooth decay and may progress to a dental abscess without treatment.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Dental












Q:
Is fluoride bad for you when used on a daily basis?


A:
According to American Dental Association, children 8 years old and younger are at risk of developing dental fluorisis if too much fluoride is ingested. Dental fluorisis is a condition that causes white spots that eventually turn brown in unerupted and developing teeth.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Dental












Q:
Why do toothaches hurt more at night?


A:
Dr. John C. Stone, a cosmetic dentist of more than 30 years, explains that toothaches hurt more at night because of the increased blood pressure to the head that occurs when lying down. A persistent toothache causes a sharp, throbbing pain at irregular periods.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Dental












Q:
How long does it take for a loose tooth to fall out?


A:
When left alone, a loose tooth takes a few months to come out on its own. However, if a child wiggles a loose tooth, it comes out far more quickly.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Dental












Q:
Why do my teeth hurt?


A:
According to the American Association of Endodontists, tooth pain can be a symptom of a wide variety of dental problems including decay, injury or infection. While mild sensitivity can be linked to receding gums and poses little harm, other dental pain can signify a more serious problem and requires a trip to the dentist for a diagnosis and treatment plan.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Dental








See More Dental Questions









Diagnostics & Imaging









Q:
What is a stereoscope used for?


A:
A stereoscope is a tool used for viewing images three-dimensionally. It has two removable eyepieces so that both eyes can be used to view an object at the same time. A stereoscope is used in various fields, such as police work, education, archeology, biology, government services, health and medical research.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Diagnostics & Imaging












Q:
What is the purpose of an MRI?


A:
The Encyclopedia of Children’s Health states that the purpose of an MRI, which stands for magnetic resonance imaging, is to generate images of the body to assist doctors in diagnosing diseases or conditions and evaluating injuries. Additionally, the National Health Service explains that the results of an MRI scan are useful in planning treatments and assessing the effectiveness of a previous treatment.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Diagnostics & Imaging












Q:
What is the difference between aseptic and sterile?


A:
According to the Wound, Ostomy and Continence Nurses Society, sterile is the absence of and continued protection against all microorganisms, while aseptic refers to protections against pathogenic microorganisms. These two techniques, while similar in purpose, differ in severity and diligence. Sterile is the more thorough of the two types.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Diagnostics & Imaging












Q:
How long do you leave a thermometer in your mouth?


A:
To obtain an accurate temperature reading, a glass thermometer must remain in the mouth for three minutes, while a digital thermometer remains in the mouth until it beeps or the temperature reading appears in the window, according to Drugs.com. The tip of the thermometer must be placed under the tongue.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Diagnostics & Imaging












Q:
What does a CT scan show?


A:
According to Johns Hopkins Medicine, a CT scan shows body parts such as organs, bones, fat and muscle in greater detail than a usual X-ray can provide. A CT scan does use X-rays, but the beam circles the area to be scanned and allows for more views and angles.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Diagnostics & Imaging












Q:
How does a CAT scan machine work?


A:
According to the FDA, CAT scans rotate an x-ray source mounted opposite a detector around a patient, producing a thin, fan-shaped beam of x-rays that pass through patients' bodies one small section at a time. The detectors register the x-rays as they pass through a patient's body and transmit them to a computer that reconstructs them into one or multiple cross-sectional images of the internal organs and tissues.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Diagnostics & Imaging








See More Diagnostics & Imaging Questions









Fitness & Exercise









Q:
How do you exercise using the water aerobics routine?


A:
Exercising with a water aerobics routine takes about half of an hour. To exercise with a water aerobics routine, you need access to an open area with water and long-resistance exercise bands.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Fitness & Exercise












Q:
What are some good workouts for teenagers?


A:
Kids Health details a good, basic workout plan for teens beginning a fitness program; it includes exercises with and without weights, session times, warm-up and cool-down routines. Complete workout programs to increase overall health and fitness are available online from a variety of sources; however, it is good to start with suggestions from teen specific sites, such as Safe Teens.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Fitness & Exercise












Q:
How do you measure cardiovascular efficiency?


A:
Cardiovascular efficiency is a measure of how effectively the circulatory system delivers oxygen to the rest of the body through the bloodstream. It can be measured in different ways, including counting beats per minute and calculating the maximum volume of oxygen that can be consumed during an individual's exercise.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Fitness & Exercise












Q:
How much does the average American exercise?


A:
Based on data collected in 2011, the average American exercises 2.5 hours per week, according to Penn State News. The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) recommends that adults between 18 and 64 years of age engage in four hours of physical activity each week.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Fitness & Exercise












Q:
Why does your heart rate increase during exercise?


A:
According to the British Journal of Anaesthesia, heart rate rises during exercise in order to increase cardiac output, compensating for increased blood flow demand to working muscles. Blood flow to the muscles is increased because of the increased workload, nutrient demand and metabolic demands of the body.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Fitness & Exercise












Q:
How does exercise affect your heart and lungs?


A:
Exercise increases the blood flow in one's heart and strengthens the heart muscles. During exercise more blood gets pumped into the lungs to enable increased oxygen absorption. This oxygen is then carried to the body muscles engaged in exercise, usually the legs and arms. When a person exercises, both his heart rate and his breathing rate increase considerably, making his heart and lungs work harder.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Fitness & Exercise








See More Fitness & Exercise Questions
















Explore Health



Conditions & Diseases




Dental




Diagnostics & Imaging




Fitness & Exercise




Insect & Animal Bites




Medical Ranges & Levels




Medications & Vitamins




Nutrition & Diets




Older Adults




Pain & Symptoms




Vision




Women's Health







                EXPLORE OTHER CATEGORIES
            


Art & Literature


Beauty & Fashion


Business & Finance


Education




Family


Food


Geography


Government & Politics




Health


History


Hobbies & Games


Holidays & Celebrations




Home & Garden


Math


Pets & Animals


Science




Sports & Active Lifestyle


Technology


Vehicles


World View









Privacy


Terms


Contact


Sitemap


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC






















Education | Reference.com









































www.reference.com
































Education




Q:

What is narrative voice in literature?



A:
Narrative voice tells whose eyes the reader sees a story through. When identifying the narrative voice in literature, it is important to consider the point of view and the narrator's degrees of omniscience, objectivity and reliability. 


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Writing




























Colleges & Universities









Q:
What is the difference between B.A. and B.A. (Hons)?


A:
A B.A. and a B.A. with honours, usually abbreviated to B.A. (Hons), are both degrees given upon completion of a three- or four-year course of study at a university in all of the United Kingdom except Scotland or countries that are members of the British Commonwealth. Both the B.A. and the B.A. (Hons) are equivalents of the Bachelor of Arts degree given in the United States upon graduation from college.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Colleges & Universities












Q:
What is the oldest university in Britain?


A:
The University of Oxford is the oldest university in Britain. While there is no precise date for its founding, the university has existed in some form since 1096.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Colleges & Universities












Q:
What is a professional diploma?


A:
A professional diploma enhances or serves as an alternative equivalent to an academic diploma. It is usually focused on certifying individuals for specific jobs or skills.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Colleges & Universities












Q:
How long do you have to go to school to be a dentist?


A:
According to About.com, eight years of secondary education is required to become a dentist. This education is comprised of a four-year bachelor's degree and a four-year dental school graduate program.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Colleges & Universities












Q:
How many years does it take to get a bachelor's degree?


A:
The Encyclopaedia Britannica states that bachelor's degrees are typically conferred on those who have successfully completed the requirements of undergraduate study, with the duration of such study generally being four years. Bachelor's degrees may also be called baccalaureate degrees.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Colleges & Universities












Q:
What is English Composition I?


A:
English Composition I is the basic composition course required at most colleges. English Composition I varies slightly from school to school, but the focus is usually on writing college-level papers using various modes of development, learning to use academic citation styles and research engines, and critical reading of arguments.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Colleges & Universities








See More Colleges & Universities Questions









Homework Help









Q:
What are the duties of a tutor?


A:
The duties of a tutor include providing students with academic support during assigned hours, developing academic materials and lessons relevant to the coursework, and collaborating with instructors to ensure the lesson materials are appropriate for the grade level or student's skill set. In an academic setting, a tutor may also be responsible for greeting guests at the front desk or answering phones in the tutoring center.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Homework Help












Q:
What is a brief summary of "To Kill a Mockingbird"?


A:
The novel "To Kill a Mockingbird" deals with serious issues, such as rape and racial inequality, as told from the viewpoint of a 10-year-old girl. It was written by Harper Lee and is loosely based on her observations of events that occurred during her childhood in her Alabama hometown in the 1930s.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Homework Help












Q:
Where can I get help with my math homework?


A:
There are many websites that help students complete their math homework and also offer lesson plans to help students understand their homework. Some examples of these websites are Khan Academy, Pinchbeck, the Scholastic Homework Club and Slader. Students can also contact a tutor or go to their teacher for private help. Websites like All Homework also do homework for the user and let them see the solutions.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Homework Help












Q:
Where can you get help in precalculus?


A:
Help for precalculus is available at numerous websites and in person at tutorial centers. Websites like Coolmath.com and TheMathPage give topic overviews and examples of how to work specific types of problems. Mathway.com allows people to enter an actual problem and works it out for them.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Homework Help












Q:
What is a person called when they turn 100 years old?


A:
A person who lives to be 100 years old is called a centenarian. While some people believe that life choices such as diet and activity level can help a person to reach this unusual milestone in life, good genetics are also necessary.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Homework Help












Q:
What are some working models for science projects?


A:
Some examples of working models for science projects include a pinhole camera, a hovercraft and a baking soda volcano. The hovercraft and volcano projects are simple enough for upper elementary and middle-school students. The camera is best for high-school students.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Homework Help








See More Homework Help Questions









K-12









Q:
Where can you learn how to make a solar system model for kids?


A:
Instructional outlets online such as How Stuff Works and About offer step-by-step instructions for creating several different types of solar system models. Premade model kits that require only minor assembly are also available through nearly all of the major online retailers .


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


K-12












Q:
Do kids have to have their photos taken in elementary school?


A:
A school may take photos of its students as part of its directory information policy, but it must notify parents how the school uses the information and to whom it is disclosed, states the U.S. Department of Education. Parents have the right to opt out of directory disclosures in writing.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


K-12












Q:
Why do schools have summer vacation?


A:
Many people believe that the origins of summer vacation are rooted in America's agricultural past. However, it was actually the vacation habits of city kids and their families that inspired what is now considered the traditional American academic calendar. Wealthy families would take their children out of school during the hottest months in favor of vacationing in cooler locations.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


K-12












Q:
At what age should a child enter kindergarten?


A:
According to Cambridge University, formal education can be delayed until the age of seven to allow children to benefit from play-based experiences during early childhood. Children beginning formal education at the age of seven benefit both socially and educationally.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


K-12












Q:
Why should students read?


A:
Some of the reasons students should read include: vocabulary and fluency improvement, better comprehension skills and for fun. Reading skills carry many benefits for children of all ages.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


K-12












Q:
What are the different approaches to learning?


A:
The three most common approaches to learning are the behaviorist, cognitive and humanist approaches. Additional modern approaches to learning include a focus on technology, social media and diversity and problem-based or competency-based learning.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


K-12








See More K-12 Questions









Public Speaking









Q:
What is a short speech about love?


A:
A short speech about love is a short oral presentation about the concept of love. The speech could contain quotes on the matter, philosophical observations or personal anecdotes. It could include the different types of love, the idealization of love, the role of love in marriage or any other topic related to love.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Public Speaking












Q:
What are the characteristics of an effective public speaker?


A:
Effective public speakers are relaxed, well-practiced, descriptive and personable with their audience. They also tend to be well-prepared, often having rehearsed their speech using visualization techniques.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Public Speaking












Q:
What is an oratorical speech?


A:
An oratorical speech is a speech delivered in the style of an orator. The term itself is somewhat redundant, as the words "oratorical" and "orator" both relate to the practice of giving speeches.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Public Speaking












Q:
What is good to say in a speech in an election running for treasurer?


A:
According to Speech-Topics-Help.com, there are 10 important ideas to guide what you say to your audience while running for a specific position, especially if you are running for treasurer. The most important of these ideas include a statement that indicates what you stand for and the reason why you want to serve as the treasurer.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Public Speaking












Q:
How do you write a leadership speech?


A:
According to recommendations by Forbes.com, there are 10 important keys to writing an effective leadership speech. These keys are underpinned by the two main objectives behind every speech: to make a good impression and to leave the audience with two or three takeaways. The first key is to be memorable, and in order to achieve this, the speech should be built around a main theme.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Public Speaking












Q:
What should you say in a farewell speech to friends?


A:
A farewell speech to friends needs to acknowledge the occasion sincerely with gratitude for the friendship, graciousness regarding the parting and a little bit of humor to lighten any sadness. Farewell speeches do not need to be excessively formal, but should treat the reason for saying good-bye with dignity and honesty. Brief, heartfelt speeches are usually appreciated more than eloquent but lengthy diatribes.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Public Speaking








See More Public Speaking Questions
















Explore Education



Colleges & Universities




Homework Help




K-12




Public Speaking




Standardized Tests




Writing







                EXPLORE OTHER CATEGORIES
            


Art & Literature


Beauty & Fashion


Business & Finance


Education




Family


Food


Geography


Government & Politics




Health


History


Hobbies & Games


Holidays & Celebrations




Home & Garden


Math


Pets & Animals


Science




Sports & Active Lifestyle


Technology


Vehicles


World View









Privacy


Terms


Contact


Sitemap


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC






















Business & Finance | Reference.com









































www.reference.com
































Business & Finance




Q:

How do you make an organizational chart?



A:
An organization chart is a diagram that shows the structure of an organization. It includes the relationships and the relative roles of the company's departments and employees. Organization charts are used as communications tools that demonstrate reporting and management relationships. Great organizational charts can be created relatively quickly using software programs.



See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Business Resources




























Business Resources









Q:
How many cases of beer are on a pallet?


A:
A pallet can hold up to 60 cases of beer. There are typically 10 cases per layer and six layers on one pallet. Most pallets in North America are as wide as they are long. The standard dimension of a pallet is 36 inches by 36 inches.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Business Resources












Q:
Why is a contract important?


A:
A contract is important because it can be used in the legal system to ensure that both parties of an agreement are equally compensated for their work, goods or money. Contracts are legal agreements that may or may not be written.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Business Resources












Q:
How should you name a pizza shop?


A:
Naming a pizza parlor is a personal decision, but the names that work the best are memorable or catchy ones. A pizza parlor's name can include the owner's name like "Sam's Pizza," it can describe a feature of the business like "Family Style Pizzeria" or "Hot and Ready Pizza," or it can describe the pizza parlor's location like "Main Street Pizza."


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Business Resources












Q:
How is a ribbon cutting ceremony conducted?


A:
Most ribbon-cutting ceremonies involve having a business owner, chamber of commerce dignitaries and maybe some area politicians taking part in a ceremony to launch a new business. Before the actual ribbon-cutting, one or more of the politicians or chamber of commerce dignitaries delivers a short speeches about the good that the business will bring to the local economy.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Business Resources












Q:
What are the required breaks for an eight-hour work day?


A:
According to the Houston Chronicle, the U.S. Department of Labor does not enforce an eight-hour workday or mandate specific breaks; it does, however, require payment for breaks shorter than 20 minutes. Nineteen states have laws governing workday breaks, though only seven states enforce eight-hour workday rules, as of 2013.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Business Resources












Q:
What is the definition of organizational resources?


A:
Organizational resources are all assets that a corporation has available to use in the production process. There are four basic types of organizational resources: human resources, capital resources, monetary resources and raw materials.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Business Resources








See More Business Resources Questions









Careers









Q:
What is the scientific name for beekeeper?


A:
The technical English terms for beekeeper are apiarist and apiculturist. Both words come from "apis," the Latin word for bee. Apis is also the name of the genus to which honey bees belong.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Careers












Q:
What are the job duties of a secretary?


A:
A secretary's duties can include many responsibilities, such as scheduling appointments and meetings, managing calls and messages from third parties and keeping and maintaining records and files. This position is also sometimes referred to as an administrative assistant.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Careers












Q:
What is the role of a receptionist?


A:
The primary role of a receptionist is to perform administrative and coordination tasks at the front desk of an office or work department. Greeting guests and customers and answering phones are core responsibilities. In these roles, the receptionist must establish and maintain rapport.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Careers












Q:
How many years does it take to become a doctor?


A:
Typically, it takes at least 11 years after graduating from high school to become a doctor. Additional years of study are often needed when a doctor specializes.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Careers












Q:
What are basic clerical duties?


A:
No matter the industry, clerical jobs usually include duties such as answering phone calls, taking messages and greeting visitors. In addition, typing, filing, sorting and distributing mail, handling office documents and maintaining appointments are often required.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Careers












Q:
How do construction workers use math?


A:
Construction workers must use math in a variety of ways while practicing their trade, including taking measurements, converting quantities and solving equations. While it is not necessary for construction workers to have an advanced education, they must be comfortable with basic mathematics and capable of performing several simple operations. Construction workers must be able to add, subtract, divide and multiply as well as work with fractions.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Careers








See More Careers Questions









Corporations









Q:
What happens to stock when a company is bought out?


A:
According to The Nest, a company no longer exists as its own independently traded company if it is bought out. Investors who own stocks or shares in the company receive some type of monetary compensation, or they are given a share in another company.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Corporations












Q:
What is a Fortune 50 company?


A:
A Fortune 50 company refers to the 50 most prosperous and progressive organizations in the world. These companies make the most revenue and hold greater sway over the world's finances than any other businesses. The top 50 organizations in the Fortune 500 listing are given this auspicious title.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Corporations












Q:
What are the objectives of McDonald's?


A:
The main objective of the McDonald's corporation is to be the customer's favorite place to eat. To achieve this, McDonald's created a global strategy called "Plan to Win," which focuses on creating an extraordinary customer experience.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Corporations












Q:
What is corporate planning?


A:
Corporate planning is a strategic tool used by companies to set long-term plans to meet certain objectives, such as business growth and sales volumes. Corporate plans are similar to strategic plans, but place greater emphasis on using internal resources and streamlining operations to achieve certain end goals.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Corporations












Q:
How is a franchise formed?


A:
Forming a franchise involves developing a business system, creating an operations manual, drafting a franchise agreement and making a marketing plan. The goals are to make the new location independent and to train the franchisee to run it on his own. Creating a franchise takes time, money and legal support.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Corporations












Q:
Why is organization important?


A:
Organization is important because it allows individuals and groups to perform tasks more efficiently. It helps people find information and items faster, and it allows groups to work together without wasting time. Organization is important for dealing with information as well.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Corporations








See More Corporations Questions









Credit & Lending









Q:
How long does it take for bad credit to go away?


A:
Negative accounts on a credit report are usually removed after 7 years; however, negative accounts pertaining to bankruptcies generally remain on the credit report for 10 years. The time starts when the account is first listed as past due, according to Equifax.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Credit & Lending












Q:
How old do you have to be to get a student loan?


A:
Students can apply for student loans without their parents cosigning at any point they are ready to enter college even if they are under the age of 18. This is because the "defense of infancy" does not apply to federal student loans.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Credit & Lending












Q:
What tools can I use when dealing with home loans?


A:
Most of the tools available that aid in estimating, obtaining and managing a home loan are online calculators. These calculators rely on accurate user input of certain variables related to the mortgage, household income and home to be purchased. The tools calculate values that are useful or necessary to know for dealing with home loans. Information is critical for mortgage shoppers, the Federal Trade Commission states.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Credit & Lending












Q:
How many times a day can a debt collector call?


A:
According to the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB), federal law does not define a specific number of times a debt collector is permitted to call, but the amount must not be enough to qualify as harassment. This rule extends to family and friends of the debtor.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Credit & Lending












Q:
How do you fix your credit?


A:
While there are no quick fixes for improving a credit score, there are steps to take to ensure that credit improves over time. According to myFICO, the first step is to make sure that the credit report is accurate and contains no incorrect late charges, delinquent accounts or any other negative items. Having an inaccurate item removed is one way to improve credit quickly.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Credit & Lending












Q:
What is the best credit score site?


A:
The best credit score website should provide its users with an easy way to find out their credit grade scores. As of 2014, any of the following three provide a great service: Equifax, Experian and FreeCreditReport.


See Full Answer

Filed Under:


Credit & Lending








See More Credit & Lending Questions
















Explore Business & Finance



Business Resources




Careers




Corporations




Credit & Lending




Currency & Conversions




Financial Calculations




Financial Planning




Household Budgets




Industries




Insurance




Investing




Mail & Shipping




Personal Banking




Real Estate




Taxes







                EXPLORE OTHER CATEGORIES
            


Art & Literature


Beauty & Fashion


Business & Finance


Education




Family


Food


Geography


Government & Politics




Health


History


Hobbies & Games


Holidays & Celebrations




Home & Garden


Math


Pets & Animals


Science




Sports & Active Lifestyle


Technology


Vehicles


World View









Privacy


Terms


Contact


Sitemap


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC


















 






 Prudential Government Money Market Fund, Inc. - Prudential Investments




























Preview Mode


















Contact Us


Sitemap


 




Financial Professional Site




Account AccessProductsOpen-End FundsFact SheetsPerformancePrices & YieldsDistributionsProspectuses & Shareholder ReportsFund CommentariesNews & UpdatesFund Comparison ToolTarget Date FundsOverviewGlidepathMulti-Vehicle ApproachPlan WellnessClosed-End FundsOverviewShareholder ReportsPress ReleasesFund Comparison ToolSeparate AccountsOverviewFact SheetsPerformanceStrategy ProfilesPortfolio ManagersDefined ContributionOur SolutionsOur ApproachOur TeamLearning CenterPruView - Our InsightsBrexit Perspectives: What's Next?Conference Call CenterFixed Income InvestingIncome InvestingInvesting BasicsInvesting in EnergyNavigating Market VolatilityRetirement Readiness StudyRising Interest RatesTax CenterThought LeadershipVideoWhat is a Mutual FundNewsroomAll NewsFormsAbout Us












Print




ProductsOpen-End FundsFact SheetsPerformancePrices & YieldsDistributionsProspectuses & Shareholder ReportsFund CommentariesNews & UpdatesFund Comparison ToolTarget Date FundsOverviewGlidepathMulti-Vehicle ApproachPlan WellnessClosed-End FundsOverviewShareholder ReportsPress ReleasesFund Comparison ToolSeparate AccountsOverviewFact SheetsPerformanceStrategy ProfilesPortfolio ManagersDefined ContributionOur SolutionsOur ApproachOur Team

      



         Prudential Government Money Market Fund, Inc.   Prudential_Goverment_Money_MarketPrudential_Goverment_Money_Market    


         Find an Open-End Fund:   Or Find a Profile:  Select a Product   Choose a Profile        Previous Page   Go Back       Additional Resources   Form N-MFP         




     The guarantee on U.S. government securities applies only to the underlying securities of the Fund's portfolio, and not to the value of the Fund's shares.         0188092-00009-00 Ed. 02/2017        FundsOpen-End Funds Closed-End Funds Target Date Funds TARGET Portfolio Trust Separate Accounts Defined Contribution Fund Comparison Tool Learning CenterVideos Investing Basics Investing in Energy Rethinking the Role of Income Investing Thought Leadership Tax Center FormsAbout UsAccount AccessFind a Financial ProfessionalFeedbackContact UsAccessibility Help        Prudential FinancialProxy Voting Records Privacy StatementTerms & ConditionsProspectuses Consider a fund's investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. The prospectus and the summary prospectus contain this and other information about the fund. Contact your financial professional for a prospectus and the summary prospectus. Read them carefully before investing.An investment in our money market funds is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. Although the funds seek to preserve the value of your clients investment at $1.00 per share, it is possible to lose money by investing in the funds.Mutual fund investing involves risk. Some mutual funds have more risk than others. The investment return and principal value will fluctuate and investor's shares when sold may be worth more or less than the original cost. Fixed income investments are subject to interest rate risk, and their value will decline as interest rates rise. Asset allocation and diversification do not assure a profit or protect against loss in declining markets. There is no guarantee a Fund's objectives will be achieved. The risks associated with each fund are explained more fully in each fund's respective prospectus. Your clients should consult with their attorney, accountant, and/or tax professional for advice concerning their particular situation.These materials are for informational or educational purposes only.  The information is not intended as investment advice and is not a recommendation about managing or investing assets.  In providing these materials PGIM Investments is not acting as your fiduciary as defined by the Department of Labor.Mutual funds are distributed by Prudential Investment Management Services LLC, a Prudential Financial company, member SIPC. Jennison Associates and PGIM, Inc. (PGIM) are registered investment advisors and Prudential Financial companies. QMA is the primary business name of Quantitative Management Associates LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of PGIM. PGIM Fixed Income and PGIM Real Estate, are units of PGIM. © 2017 Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Jennison Associates, Jennison, PGIM Real Estate, PGIM and the PGIM logo are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide.Prudential Financial, Inc. of the United States is not affiliated with Prudential plc. which is headquartered in the United Kingdom.Mutual Funds: Are not insured by the FDIC or any other federal government agency, may lose value, and are not a deposit of or guaranteed by any bank or any bank affiliate.        Template: 0195538-00014-00 Ed. 06/2016  



Products / Open-End Funds / 












  PBMXX Quote - Prudential Government Money Market Fund Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Prudential Government Money Market Fund Inc   PBMXX:US   NASDAQ GM        1.00USD         As of 12:00 AM EDT 7/26/2017     Days to Maturity   34    Total Assets (m -) (on 07/27/2017)   548.186    Inception Date   06/01/1976    52Wk Range   0.01 - 0.31                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   0.00    52Wk Range   0.01 - 0.31    Days to Maturity   34    Total Assets (m -) (on 07/27/2017)   548.186    Inception Date   06/01/1976    Fund Managers   JOSEPH D'ANGELO / MANOLITA GUDE    Current Mgmt Fee   0.32%    Expense Ratio   0.16%                Top Fund Holdings       Name Position Value % of Fund        LW138646:COR   FHLBDN 0 07/12/17    36.00 k 35.99 m 6.59      LW138657:COR   FHLBDN 0 07/26/17    28.00 k 27.98 m 5.12      LW471427:COR   FHLBDN 0 08/16/17    26.00 k 25.97 m 4.75      LW471414:COR   FHLBDN 0 08/02/17    23.00 k 22.98 m 4.20      LW471440:COR   FHLBDN 0 08/31/17    21.00 k 20.96 m 3.84      LW471430:COR   FHLBDN 0 08/18/17    16.00 k 15.98 m 2.92      LW471433:COR   FHLBDN 0 08/23/17    15.00 k 14.98 m 2.74      LW471420:COR   FHLBDN 0 08/09/17    13.00 k 12.99 m 2.38      LW920120:COR   FHLBDN 0 09/22/17    13.00 k 12.97 m 2.37      LW471416:COR   FHLBDN 0 08/04/17    12.00 k 11.99 m 2.19           Profile   Prudential Government Money Market Fund Inc is an open-end fund incorporated in the USA. The Fund seeks maximum current income consistent with stability of capital and the maintenance of liquidity. The Fund invests in cash, government securities, and/or repurchase agreements that are fully collaterized with cash or government securities.    Address  Prudential Investments LLC655 Broad StreetNewark, NJ 07102-4410   Phone  1-800-225-1852   Website   www.prudentialfunds.com               






 Fund Profile (Open-End Funds) - Prudential Investments



























Preview Mode


















Contact Us


Sitemap


 




Financial Professional Site




Account AccessProductsOpen-End FundsFact SheetsPerformancePrices & YieldsDistributionsProspectuses & Shareholder ReportsFund CommentariesNews & UpdatesFund Comparison ToolTarget Date FundsOverviewGlidepathMulti-Vehicle ApproachPlan WellnessClosed-End FundsOverviewShareholder ReportsPress ReleasesFund Comparison ToolSeparate AccountsOverviewFact SheetsPerformanceStrategy ProfilesPortfolio ManagersDefined ContributionOur SolutionsOur ApproachOur TeamLearning CenterPruView - Our InsightsBrexit Perspectives: What's Next?Conference Call CenterFixed Income InvestingIncome InvestingInvesting BasicsInvesting in EnergyNavigating Market VolatilityRetirement Readiness StudyRising Interest RatesTax CenterThought LeadershipVideoWhat is a Mutual FundNewsroomAll NewsFormsAbout Us











 
Print




ProductsOpen-End FundsFact SheetsPerformancePrices & YieldsDistributionsProspectuses & Shareholder ReportsFund CommentariesNews & UpdatesFund Comparison ToolTarget Date FundsOverviewGlidepathMulti-Vehicle ApproachPlan WellnessClosed-End FundsOverviewShareholder ReportsPress ReleasesFund Comparison ToolSeparate AccountsOverviewFact SheetsPerformanceStrategy ProfilesPortfolio ManagersDefined ContributionOur SolutionsOur ApproachOur Team









Overview


Prices & Performance


Holdings Details


Managers


Literature




Quarterly SEC Performance


Monthly Performance


Prices & Yields







Prudential Government Money Market Fund, Inc. 




Find a fund profile20/20Absolute Return BondBalancedBlendCalifornia Muni IncomeConservative AllocationConservative GrowthCore BondCorporate BondDefensive EquityEmerging Markets Debt Local CurrencyEmerging Markets EquityEquity IncomeEquity OpportunityFinancial ServicesFloating Rate IncomeFocused GrowthGlobal Absolute Return BondGlobal InfrastructureGlobal OpportunitiesGlobal Real EstateGlobal Tactical AllocationGlobal Total ReturnGovernment IncomeGovernment Money MarketGrowthGrowth AllocationHealth SciencesHigh YieldIncome BuilderInternational BondInternational EquityInternational OpportunitiesLarge-Cap Core EquityLong-Short EquityMid-Cap GrowthMid-Cap ValueMLPModerate AllocationMuni High IncomeNational MuniNatural ResourcesReal AssetsReal Estate IncomeRising DividendSelect Real EstateShort Duration High Yield IncomeShort Duration Multi-Sector BondShort Duration Muni High IncomeShort-Term Corporate BondSmall-Cap ValueSmall CompanyStock IndexStrategic ValueTotal Return BondUnconstrained BondUS Real EstateUtilityValue






 



 
 


 
 


 
 





 



















Average Annual Total Returns 
as of 6/30/2017
Total Returns (%)
(without sales charge)
Total Returns (%)
(with sales charge)



ClassTickerInception Date 
YTD
1- Year 
3- Year 
5- Year 
10- Year 
Since Inception
1- Year 
3- Year 
5- Year 
10- Year 
Since Inception





A**PBMXX06/19760.030.040.020.020.534.840.040.020.020.534.84


A**MJAXX06/19760.030.040.020.020.534.840.040.020.020.534.84


BMJBXX03/20050.060.070.030.020.561.220.070.030.020.561.22


CMJCXX03/20050.060.070.030.020.561.220.070.030.020.561.22


ZPMZXX03/19960.060.070.030.020.562.230.070.030.020.562.23



Lipper U.S. Government Money Market Funds Average
0.090.120.040.030.454.790.120.040.030.454.79



Past performance does not guarantee future results and current performance may be lower or higher than the past performance data quoted. The investment return and principal value will fluctuate, and shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than the original cost. 
Prior to March 30, 2016, the Fund operated as a prime money market fund and invested in certain types of securities that, as a government money market fund, the Fund is no longer permitted to hold. Consequently, the performance above may have been different if the current investment limitations had been in effect during the period prior. 

See Daily Returns for the Prudential Government Money Market Fund, Inc..
See Quarterly SEC Standardized Performance of other PGIM Investments Mutual Funds.

 
 


 
 




Fund ExpensesMaximum Sales Charges (%)



ClassGross (%)Net (%)Date*





A**0.60———


A**0.60———


B0.48———


C0.48———


Z0.48———




*This date represents the contractual reduction date through which the net expense ratio is in effect. 

See Sales Load Breakpoints. 
 


*This date represents the contractual reduction date through which the net expense ratio is in effect. 

See Sales Load Breakpoints. 
 



back to top






 



















Average Annual Total Returns 
as of 6/30/2017
Total Returns (%)
(without sales charge)
Total Returns (%)
(with sales charge)



ClassTickerInception Date 
YTD
1- Year 
3- Year 
5- Year 
10- Year 
Since Inception
1- Year 
3- Year 
5- Year 
10- Year 
Since Inception





A**PBMXX06/19760.030.040.020.020.534.840.040.020.020.534.84


A**MJAXX06/19760.030.040.020.020.534.840.040.020.020.534.84


BMJBXX03/20050.060.070.030.020.561.220.070.030.020.561.22


CMJCXX03/20050.060.070.030.020.561.220.070.030.020.561.22


ZPMZXX03/19960.060.070.030.020.562.230.070.030.020.562.23



Lipper U.S. Government Money Market Funds Average
0.090.120.040.030.454.790.120.040.030.454.79



Past performance does not guarantee future results and current performance may be lower or higher than the past performance data quoted. The investment return and principal value will fluctuate, and shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than the original cost. 

See Daily Returns for the Prudential Government Money Market Fund, Inc..
See Monthly Performance of other PGIM Mutual Funds.

 
 


 
 




Fund ExpensesMaximum Sales Charges (%)



ClassGross (%)Net (%)Date*





A**0.60———


A**0.60———


B0.48———


C0.48———


Z0.48———




*This date represents the contractual reduction date through which the net expense ratio is in effect. 

See Sales Load Breakpoints. 
 


*This date represents the contractual reduction date through which the net expense ratio is in effect. 

See Sales Load Breakpoints. 
 



back to top






 





                        Money Market Yields as of 
                        7/27/2017





A**0.140.130.211.0035430,941,133.22


A**0.140.130.211.0035430,941,133.22


B0.270.260.341.003515,791,335.29


C0.270.260.341.003512,693,789.25


Z0.270.260.341.003588,759,945.86




 



back to top







Total return describes the return to the investor after net operating expenses but before any sales charges are imposed. Lipper average is unmanaged, is based on the average return of all funds in this category, and does not take into consideration applicable sales charges. Unless noted otherwise, Lipper averages and index returns reflect performance beginning the closest month-end date to the Fund's inception. Benchmark since inception average is based on Class Z inception date. SEC standardized return describes the return to the investor after net operating expense and maximum sales charges are imposed. All returns assume share price changes as well as the compounding effect of reinvested dividends and capital gains. Returns may reflect fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements. Without such, returns would be lower. All returns 1-year or less are cumulative. 


Lipper U.S. Government Money Market Funds Average is based on the average return of all mutual funds in the Lipper U.S. Government Money Market Funds category. Lipper U.S. Government Money Market Funds invest principally in financial instruments issued or guaranteed by the U.S. government, its agencies, or its instrumentalities, with dollar-weighted average maturities of less than 90 days. These funds intend to keep constant net asset value. An investment cannot be made directly in an index or average. All indexes and averages are unmanaged. 
Click here for additional disclosures. 





Click here for additional disclosures. 





Past performance does not guarantee future results and current performance may be lower or higher than the past performance data quoted. The investment return and principal value will fluctuate, and shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than the original cost. 

The yield quotations more closely reflect the current earnings of the fund than a total return quotation. Past performance does not guarantee future results and current performance may be lower or higher than the past performance data quoted. The investment return and principal value will fluctuate, and shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than the original cost. There are no sales charges to purchase or redeem this fund. 



This material must be preceded or accompanied by a current prospectus or summary prospectus. Consider a fund's investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses carefully before investing. The prospectus and summary prospectus contain this and other information about the fund. For more information about a fund, click on the prospectus or summary prospectus link above. Read them carefully before investing. 


Click here for additional disclosures. 





Prudential Financial, Inc. of the United States is not affiliated with Prudential plc. which is headquartered in the United Kingdom.



0235794-00014-00    Ed. 3/2017   








      FundsOpen-End Funds Closed-End Funds Target Date Funds TARGET Portfolio Trust Separate Accounts Defined Contribution Fund Comparison Tool Learning CenterVideos Investing Basics Investing in Energy Rethinking the Role of Income Investing Thought Leadership Tax Center FormsAbout UsAccount AccessFind a Financial ProfessionalFeedbackContact UsAccessibility Help        Prudential FinancialProxy Voting Records Privacy Statement Terms & ConditionsProspectuses Mutual Funds: Are not insured by the FDIC or any other federal government agency, may lose value, and are not a deposit of or guaranteed by any bank or any bank affiliate.© 2017 Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities.Template: 0171365-00009-00 Ed. 03/2017  



Products / Open-End Funds / Fact Sheets













MJAXX Fund - Prudential Government Money Market Fund Inc. Cl A Exchange Overview - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,796.55


85.54


0.39%











S&P 500

2,475.42


-2.41


-0.10%











Nasdaq

6,382.19


-40.56


-0.63%











GlobalDow

2,849.40


-1.68


-0.06%











Gold

1,265.40


-1.10


-0.09%











Oil

48.99


-0.05


-0.10%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ADP 
9.1




TSCO 
7.7




VZ 
7.7




ORLY 
7.4






CA
-10.2




JCI
-7.3




FFIV
-7.2




XL
-6.7














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








9:01p

Updated
Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’



8:31p

Amazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift



8:13p

Redfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation



8:05p

SpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round



7:14p

Headline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster



7:14p

Updated
Howard Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise



6:55p

Senate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote



6:46p

Updated
Scaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy



6:39p

Updated
Ethereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency



6:04p

This fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Mutual Funds


MJAXX


Overview



Compare Quotes
Fund Comparison
Market Screener
Mutual Fund Screener
Sectors

 



MJAXX
U.S.: Mutual Funds


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Prudential Government Money Market Fund Inc. Cl A Exchange

Watchlist 
CreateMJAXXAlert



  



Last Updated: Jul 26, 2017 EDT



$
1.00



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$1.00





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




Day Range



1.00
52 Week Low/High
1.00


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Holdings


News


Charts


Historical Quotes



   




Key Data



52 Week Range
1.00 - 1.00



YTD
N/A



5 Year
N/A



Total Net Assets
N/A



Net Expense Ratio
N/A



Turnover %
N/A




 
  

 


Fees & Expenses

No information available



Risk Measures

No information available



Min. Investment

No information available

 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available




No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News




No Headlines Available





  



Distributions







No information available

 


Fund Comparison




Tickers:
















Compare:


Returns
Risk
Fees
Holdings


Compare





Find Another Fund




Fund Type:


All Types
Growth
Value
Core
Mixed
Global
Sector
S&P 500
Fixed Income
Govt Debt



Net Assets:


All Ranges
Under $50 Million
$50 - $150 Million
$150 - $250 Million
$250 - $500 Million
Over $500 Million



Return:


1 Day
1 Week
4 Weeks
13 Weeks
Month To Date
Quarter To Date
Year To Date
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Quarter To Date
Since Inception


Show Funds



   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





AMZN

-0.65%








INTC

0.63%








SBUX

2.69%








BIDU

-0.08%








FSLR

-1.39%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Investing News - Investment Articles - Investing Research

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets




















  
      Investing
    





Mutual Funds »








What a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
              
              Oil companies are sounding a recurring theme: lower exploration and production spending estimates. Will that lead to a rally in oil prices?              
              
            

5:47 p.m.  Today5:47 p.m. July 27, 2017






Put your money where your mindset is
              
              Socially conscious mutual funds invest in ways that can be good for society and your portfolio.              
              
            

1:35 p.m.  Today1:35 p.m. July 27, 2017






How Venezuela chaos could spark oil rally OPEC has failed to achieve 
              
              Political and economic turmoil in Venezuela could fuel a rise in oil prices—something the Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries, despite it’s efforts to cut back production, hasn’t been able to do.              
              
            

2:07 p.m. July 26, 2017










Most popular funds ›


Fidelity Contra /quotes/zigman/226510/realtime
118.79
-0.56
-0.47%


Vanguard 500 Idx /quotes/zigman/245160/realtime
228.79
-0.20
-0.09%


CGM Tr Focus /quotes/zigman/188272/realtime
49.03
-0.60
-1.21%


Dodge Cox Stock /quotes/zigman/224556/realtime
195.36
-0.89
-0.45%


Fairholme /quotes/zigman/265845/realtime
20.48
-0.27
-1.30%


T. Rowe Price Eq Inc /quotes/zigman/240035/realtime
33.53
+0.02
+0.06%


USAA Metals Min /quotes/zigman/244622/realtime
12.81
-0.17
-1.31%








Exchange Traded Funds »








Traders Bet On Gold Miner Rally
              
              Traders Bet On Gold Miner Rally              
              
            

1:40 p.m.  Today1:40 p.m. July 27, 2017
(Benzinga.com)












SPY



							7/27/2017 6:30pm
					



SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust


/quotes/zigman/714403/composite

247.2


-0.23
-0.09%













Exchange traded funds ›


PowerShares QQQ /quotes/zigman/105934/composite
143.96
-0.91
-0.63%


iShares Russell 2000 /quotes/zigman/260873/composite
142.34
-0.91
-0.64%


Financial Sector SPDR /quotes/zigman/246222/composite
24.91
-0.14
-0.56%


Energy Sector SPDR /quotes/zigman/246199/composite
66.55
+0.67
+1.02%


iShares MSCI Em Mkt /quotes/zigman/322623/composite
43.77
-0.24
-0.55%







/conga/native_unit.html
370720





Stocks »







/conga/investing/stocks/main.html
1293






A quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
              
              Throughout 2017, there’s one acronym that investors have in particular been sinking their teeth into: FAANG.              
              
            

5:22 p.m.  Today5:22 p.m. July 27, 2017






Amazon earnings fall 77%, shares drop
              
              Amazon.com Inc.  reported much lower earnings than expected Thursday, and shares declined more than 2% in late trading. The e-commerce giant reported net income of $197 million, or 40 cents a share, on sales of $38 billion, a profit decline of 77% from the same quarter a year ago. Analysts on average expected Amazon to report earnings of $1.41 a share on sales of $37.2 billion. The company's spending cut into profit, as fulfillment costs -- the amount Amazon spends to fulfill customers' orders on its e-commerce platform -- rose about 33% from a year ago and spending on technology and content increased by about 43%. Amazon stock traded at all-time highs this week, making Amazon the fourth U.S. company with a market capitalization of $500 billion and briefly giving Chief Executive Jeff Bezos the title of richest man in the world, but shares declined about 2% in immediate after-hours action.              
              
            

5:00 p.m.  Today5:00 p.m. July 27, 2017










Most popular stocks  ›


BAC /quotes/zigman/190927/composite
24.11
-0.10
-0.41%


C /quotes/zigman/5065548/composite
67.60
-0.38
-0.56%


MSFT /quotes/zigman/20493/composite
73.16
-0.89
-1.20%


INTC /quotes/zigman/20392/composite
34.97
+0.22
+0.63%


CSCO /quotes/zigman/20039/composite
31.57
-0.09
-0.28%


F /quotes/zigman/264304/composite
11.18
+0.12
+1.08%


WFC /quotes/zigman/239557/composite
54.71
-0.20
-0.36%


JPM /quotes/zigman/272085/composite
91.55
-0.38
-0.41%








Bonds »








Profit-Taking Hits Global Stocks
              
              Asia-Pacific stock markets were hit by profit-taking Friday, after a strong week in the region and a selloff in U.S. tech stocks overnight.              
              
            

2 min ago10:54 p.m. July 27, 2017






The 3D Printing Metals Market Will Be Worth $12B in 2028 Forecasts New IDTechEx Research Report
              
              The 3D Printing Metals Market Will Be Worth $12B in 2028 Forecasts New IDTechEx Research Report              
              
            

9:01 p.m.  Today9:01 p.m. July 27, 2017












BX:TMUBMUSD03M



							7/27/2017 10:54pm
					



U.S. 3 Month Treasury Bill


/quotes/zigman/15866657/realtime

1.1106


+0.0050
+0.45%













Bonds ›


6 mo Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866663/realtime
1.14
-0.0026
-0.23%


2 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866656/realtime
1.36
-0.0080
-0.59%


5 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866662/realtime
1.84
-0.0082
-0.44%


10 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866666/realtime
2.30
-0.0098
-0.42%


30 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866668/realtime
2.91
-0.0094
-0.32%








Options »





				OPTIONS SCREENER |
				
				EXPIRATIONS |
				
				OPTIONS CHAINS |
				
				GETTING STARTED
/conga/mininav/investing-options.html
2543








Extremely low volatility could lead to a sharp, but short-lived, decline in stocks 
              
              Still, a chart of the S&P 500 reveals an undercurrent of bullishness, says Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

1:42 p.m. July 19, 2017






Who trades options the most? Millennial investors
              
              Millennials are frequently criticized by market experts for the way they invest—or, more accurately, the way they’re not investing—but recent research indicates that at least some young market participants are going about things in a more sophisticated way than they’re typically given credit for.              
              
            

1:32 p.m. May 24, 2017












VIX



							7/27/2017 3:14pm
					



CBOE Volatility Index


/quotes/zigman/2766221/delayed

10.11


+0.51
+5.31%













Options ›


SPX /quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42
-2.41
-0.10%


DJIA /quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55
+85.54
+0.39%


COMP /quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19
-40.56
-0.63%


RUT /quotes/zigman/2759624/delayed
1,433.62
-8.66
-0.60%


MID /quotes/zigman/6015543/delayed
1,771.02
-5.67
-0.32%








Currencies »








Dollar rises from 13-month low
              
              The U.S. dollar rises on Thursday, gaining against major rivals in what analysts suggest a mild consolidation following precipitous declines over recent weeks.               
              
            

2:41 p.m.  Today2:41 p.m. July 27, 2017






Donald Trump is winning the currency cold war: Pimco
              
              The Trump administration’s trade bullying “has killed the dollar bull,” says Pimco’s Joachim Fels.              
              
            

8:24 a.m.  Today8:24 a.m. July 27, 2017












USDJPY



							7/27/2017 10:56pm
					



Japanese Yen


/quotes/zigman/16008150/realtime/sampled

111.099


-0.1600
-0.1438%













One U.S. Dollar Buys ›


British Pound /quotes/zigman/16008140/realtime/sampled
1.3086
+0.0020
+0.1531%


Brazilian Real /quotes/zigman/15936989/realtime/sampled
3.1541
+0.0037
+0.1174%








Commodities »






Rocket Maker SpaceX’s Valuation Soars to $21 Billion 
              
              SpaceX has raised as much as $350 million in a new round of financing that boosted the company’s valuation, a vote of confidence for founder Elon Musk who is seeking to prove the rocket maker can become a major satellite operator.               
              
            

54 min ago10:02 p.m. July 27, 2017










Commodities  ›


Brent Crude /quotes/zigman/18185161/delayed
51.43
-0.06
-0.12%


Heating Oil /quotes/zigman/25024089/delayed
1.60
-0.0027
-0.17%


Natural Gas /quotes/zigman/2306589/delayed
2.96
-0.0050
-0.17%


Gold /quotes/zigman/7730417/delayed
1,265.40
-1.10
-0.09%


Silver /quotes/zigman/60158948/delayed
16.55
-0.02
-0.14%


Platinum /quotes/zigman/74312941/delayed
929.00
+2.60
+0.28%


Corn /quotes/zigman/25518705/delayed
387.50
-0.25
-0.06%

















Most Popular





1.





Market Extra

President Donald Trump is set to unleash a cascade of stock-market anxiety






2.





Market Snapshot

Dow posts worst losing streak in 2 months on eve of Trump’s inauguration






3.





Howard Gold's No-Nonsense Investing

Fund manager who correctly predicted 2014 drop in oil now sees prices in the $30s






4.






My dad talked me out of the decade’s best investment, but he wasn’t wrong






5.





SectorWatch

What Trump's vow to repeal Dodd-Frank means for banks








Stock Screener »


Find your top stocks

		Identify stocks based on criteria that you select, such as price 
		movement, volume, fundamentals, technical behavior and industry. 








/conga/tools/stock-screener.html
2585








Find a Broker

Partner Center »

















            SPONSORED SECTIONS
    


Compare current broker offers 






Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




10:56 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:01pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
8:32pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
8:14pRedfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation
8:06pSpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round
7:15pHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
7:14pHeadline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster
6:55pSenate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote
6:47pScaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy
6:39pEthereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency
6:04pThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
6:03pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
5:48pTesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
5:48pWhat a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
5:43pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
5:33pBitcoin investors: things may get very ugly soon, if this chart overlay is right
5:33pBaidu ADRs rally 7% after earnings beat
5:30pBREAKINGSenators demand House conference promise before voting on 'skinny' Obamacare repeal
5:27pJonathan Golub leaves RBC to head equities strategy at Credit Suisse: report
5:23pAmazon earnings forecast shows spending expected to continue
5:22pA quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55

+85.54
+0.39%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19

-40.56
-0.63%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42

-2.41
-0.10%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15





















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




10:56 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:01pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
8:32pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
8:14pRedfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation
8:06pSpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round
7:15pHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
7:14pHeadline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster
6:55pSenate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote
6:47pScaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy
6:39pEthereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency
6:04pThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
6:03pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
5:48pTesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
5:48pWhat a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
5:43pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
5:33pBitcoin investors: things may get very ugly soon, if this chart overlay is right
5:33pBaidu ADRs rally 7% after earnings beat
5:30pBREAKINGSenators demand House conference promise before voting on 'skinny' Obamacare repeal
5:27pJonathan Golub leaves RBC to head equities strategy at Credit Suisse: report
5:23pAmazon earnings forecast shows spending expected to continue
5:22pA quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55

+85.54
+0.39%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19

-40.56
-0.63%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42

-2.41
-0.10%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Funds/A Z Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Funds A-Z


0-9A (current)BCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

AAM S - AB GrAB Gr - AB MuAB Mu - AberdAberd - ACR MActiv - AdvisAdvis - AdvisAdvis - AdvisAdvis - AdvisAdvis - AlgerAlger - AlliaAllia - AlliaAllia - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmundAmund - AmundAmund - AmundAmund - AQR MAQR M - ArrowArrow - AustrAustr - Azzad



Name
Country
Exchange
Sector




AAM Select Income Fund;A (CPUAX)
United States
XNAS



AAM Select Income Fund;C (CPUCX)
United States
XNAS



AAM Select Income Fund;I (CPUIX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/Bahl & Gaynor Income Growth Fund;A (AFNAX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/Bahl & Gaynor Income Growth Fund;C (AFYCX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/Bahl & Gaynor Income Growth Fund;I (AFNIX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/HIMCO Short Duration Fund;A (ASDAX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/HIMCO Short Duration Fund;C (ASDCX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/HIMCO Short Duration Fund;I (ASDIX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Alternative Return Portfolio;A (AARAX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Alternative Return Portfolio;Advisor (AARYX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Alternative Return Portfolio;C (AARCX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Income Portfolio;A (MRKAX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Income Portfolio;Advisor (MRKYX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Income Portfolio;C (MRKCX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;1 (AMTOX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;2 (AMTTX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;A (AMTAX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;Advisor (AMTYX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;C (ACMTX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;I (AMTIX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;K (AMTKX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;R (AMTRX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;Z (AMTZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Arizona Portfolio;A (AAZAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Arizona Portfolio;B (AAZBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Arizona Portfolio;C (AAZCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Asia ex-Japan Equity Portfolio;A (AXJAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Asia ex-Japan Equity Portfolio;Advisor (AXJYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Asia ex-Japan Equity Portfolio;C (AXJCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;A (ABWAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;Advisor (ABWYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;B (ABWBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;C (ABWCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;I (ABWIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;K (ABWKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;R (ABWRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;1 (ABNOX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;2 (ABNTX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;A (ABNAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;Advisor (ABNYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;C (ABNCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;I (ANBIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;K (ABNKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;R (ABNRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;Z (ABNZX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;A (ALCAX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;Advisor (ALCVX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;B (ALCBX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;C (ACACX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;A (WPASX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;Advisor (WPSGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;C (WPCSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;I (WPSIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;K (WPSKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;R (WPRSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;Z (WPSZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated International Growth Portfolio;A (CIAGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated International Growth Portfolio;Advisor (CIGYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated International Growth Portfolio;C (CICGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;A (ABPAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;Advisor (ABPYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;B (ABPBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;C (ABPCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;I (APWIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;K (APWKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;R (APPRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;A (ADGAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;Advisor (ADGYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;B (ADGBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;C (ADGCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;I (ADGIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;K (ADGKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;R (ADGRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;Z (ADGZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Corporate Income Shares (ACISX)
United States
XNAS



AB Credit Long/Short Portfolio;A (ALASX)
United States
XNAS



AB Credit Long/Short Portfolio;Advisor (ALYSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Credit Long/Short Portfolio;C (ALCSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;A (CHCLX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;Adv (CHCYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;B (CHCBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;C (CHCCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;I (CHCIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;K (CHCKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;R (CHCRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;Z (CHCZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;A (ABASX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;Advisor (ABYSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;B (ABBSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;C (ABCSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;I (ABSIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;K (ABSKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;R (ABSRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;Z (ABSZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Core Portfolio;A (EMPAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Core Portfolio;Advisor (EMPYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Core Portfolio;C (EMPCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Growth Portfolio;A (EGPAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Growth Portfolio;Adv (EGPYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Growth Portfolio;C (EGPCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;A (ABAEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;Adv (ABYEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;C (ABCEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;I (ABIEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;K (ABKEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;R (ABREX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;A (AUIAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;Advisor (AUIYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;B (AUIBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;C (AUICX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;I (AUIIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;K (AUIKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;R (AUIRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;Z (AUIZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;A (ANAGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;Adv (ANAYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;B (ANABX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;C (ANACX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;I (ANAIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;K (ANAKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;R (ANARX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;Z (ANAZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Core Equity Portfolio;A (GCEAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Core Equity Portfolio;Adv (GCEYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Core Equity Portfolio;C (GCECX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund II;I (ARIIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;A (AREAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;Advisor (ARSYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;B (AREBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;C (ARECX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;I (AEEIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;K (ARRKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;R (ARRRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;A (CABNX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;Advisor (CBSYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;B (CABBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;C (CBACX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;I (CABIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;K (CBSKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;R (CBSRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;A (ALTFX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;Advisor (ATEYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;B (ATEBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;C (ATECX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;I (AGTIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;K (ATEKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;R (ATERX)
United States
XNAS



AB Government Money Market Portfolio;Inst (GMOXX)
United States
XNAS



AB Growth & Income Fund;A (CABDX)
United States
XNAS




«1234567891011-2021-29»










Log In




10:56 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:01pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
8:32pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
8:14pRedfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation
8:06pSpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round
7:15pHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
7:14pHeadline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster
6:55pSenate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote
6:47pScaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy
6:39pEthereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency
6:04pThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
6:03pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
5:48pTesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
5:48pWhat a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
5:43pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
5:33pBitcoin investors: things may get very ugly soon, if this chart overlay is right
5:33pBaidu ADRs rally 7% after earnings beat
5:30pBREAKINGSenators demand House conference promise before voting on 'skinny' Obamacare repeal
5:27pJonathan Golub leaves RBC to head equities strategy at Credit Suisse: report
5:23pAmazon earnings forecast shows spending expected to continue
5:22pA quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55

+85.54
+0.39%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19

-40.56
-0.63%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42

-2.41
-0.10%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































MJAXX Fund - Prudential Government Money Market Fund Inc. Cl A Exchange Overview - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,796.55


85.54


0.39%











S&P 500

2,475.42


-2.41


-0.10%











Nasdaq

6,382.19


-40.56


-0.63%











GlobalDow

2,849.44


-1.64


-0.06%











Gold

1,265.40


-1.10


-0.09%











Oil

49.00


-0.04


-0.08%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ADP 
9.1




TSCO 
7.7




VZ 
7.7




ORLY 
7.4






CA
-10.2




JCI
-7.3




FFIV
-7.2




XL
-6.7














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








9:01p

Updated
Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’



8:31p

Amazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift



8:13p

Redfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation



8:05p

SpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round



7:14p

Headline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster



7:14p

Updated
Howard Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise



6:55p

Senate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote



6:46p

Updated
Scaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy



6:39p

Updated
Ethereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency



6:04p

This fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Mutual Funds


MJAXX


Overview



Compare Quotes
Fund Comparison
Market Screener
Mutual Fund Screener
Sectors

 



MJAXX
U.S.: Mutual Funds


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Prudential Government Money Market Fund Inc. Cl A Exchange

Watchlist 
CreateMJAXXAlert



  



Last Updated: Jul 26, 2017 EDT



$
1.00



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$1.00





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




Day Range



1.00
52 Week Low/High
1.00


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Holdings


News


Charts


Historical Quotes



   




Key Data



52 Week Range
1.00 - 1.00



YTD
N/A



5 Year
N/A



Total Net Assets
N/A



Net Expense Ratio
N/A



Turnover %
N/A




 
  

 


Fees & Expenses

No information available



Risk Measures

No information available



Min. Investment

No information available

 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available




No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News




No Headlines Available





  



Distributions







No information available

 


Fund Comparison




Tickers:
















Compare:


Returns
Risk
Fees
Holdings


Compare





Find Another Fund




Fund Type:


All Types
Growth
Value
Core
Mixed
Global
Sector
S&P 500
Fixed Income
Govt Debt



Net Assets:


All Ranges
Under $50 Million
$50 - $150 Million
$150 - $250 Million
$250 - $500 Million
Over $500 Million



Return:


1 Day
1 Week
4 Weeks
13 Weeks
Month To Date
Quarter To Date
Year To Date
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Quarter To Date
Since Inception


Show Funds



   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





AMZN

-0.65%








INTC

0.63%








SBUX

2.69%








BIDU

-0.08%








FSLR

-1.39%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.














Investing in Mutual Funds | Prudential.com














Skip to Main Content





Prudential Home
Customer Support



Search











Select Options



 
Log in to Your Account
Insurance, Mutual Funds & Annuities
401(k) / 403(b) / 457 / Pensions
Pruco COMMAND or Investor
Alliance Account

All Login Options




OUR COMPANY
PRODUCTS & SERVICES

RESEARCH & PERSPECTIVES
INVESTOR RELATIONS
CORPORATE RESPONSIBILITY
NEWSROOM
CAREERS











			SOLUTIONS FOR INDIVIDUALS
		

			SOLUTIONS FOR BUSINESSES & ORGANIZATIONS
		





Insurance

Life Insurance
Annuities



Investments

Mutual Funds
Brokerage Accounts
Strategic Investment Research Group



Retirement

Retirement Solutions
The Retirement Red Zone
Retirement Accounts



Planning Guides

Women & Money
African American Financial Experience
Retirement Planning

All Guides, Tutorials & Calculators






Benefits & Services

Retirement Services
Group Insurance



Institutional Investments
            & Products

Institutional Investments
Private Placements
Guaranteed Investments
Financial Institution Products



Retirement

Defined Contribution
Defined Benefit
Guaranteed Retirement Income
Pension Risk Strategies



Commercial Property

Commercial Mortgages
Real Estate Investing



Research & Perspectives

Retirement Reports
Institutional Investments Reports
Group Benefits Reports
Annuities, Life Insurance & Mutual Funds Reports





 







            Investment Basics: Mutual Funds
          
Investments / Investment Basics: Mutual Funds









				Skip to:
				
Select a section















A mutual fund is an investment company that pools money from shareholders to invest in a diversified portfolio of securities. When an investor puts money into a mutual fund, the investor is purchasing shares of that fund. Each share represents proportionate ownership in the fund's underlying securities.

Mutual funds are managed by professionals who employ an investment strategy to meet the objectives stated in the prospectus. Although there is no guarantee that the objectives of a particular fund will be achieved, fund managers choose investments based upon the mutual fund's goal - growth, current income, and so on. The funds are generally well diversified to offset potential losses. As economic conditions change, the blend of investment instruments in the fund may change, depending on what the prevailing situation calls for - sometimes a more aggressive stance, sometimes a more defensive one.

Types of Mutual Funds
There are four basic types of mutual funds:

Stock Funds
Sometimes called equity funds, the primary purpose of these funds is to provide growth of capital through equity investments, although some also seek to provide dividend income as a secondary objective.


Balanced Funds
These funds invest in common stocks, preferred stocks, and bonds in an attempt for high returns with less volatility.


Bond Funds
The main goal of these types of funds is to provide current income by investing in U.S. Government, corporate or municipal debt obligations.


Money Market Funds
A money market fund is a mutual fund that invests in short-term obligations created by groups of local governments, the federal government, banks, or large corporations. These are the lowest-risk investment among all mutual funds. However, they tend to provide the lowest returns.

An investment in any money market fund is neither insured nor guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. Although the fund seeks to preserve the value of your investment at one dollar per share, it is possible to lose money by investing in the fund.


Advantages and Disadvantages








Mutual Funds


Advantages
Disadvantages




Diversification: Mutual funds typically invest in different securities to create a diverse portfolio. Since each share of a mutual fund represents ownership of the fund's underlying securities, one share provides diversification across many securities. Although diversification does not eliminate market risk, it can help reduce risk by offsetting losses from some securities with gains in other securities. There are currently more than 7,000 mutual funds available, ranging from aggressive to defensive. Some concentrate on certain industry sectors, while others draw from a wide base of companies and investments.


Professional Money Management: A professional portfolio manager manages money that is invested in a mutual fund. In-depth market research and analysis is performed in choosing the investments of the fund. The portfolio manager ensures that the investments remain consistent with the fund's objectives as stated in the prospectus.


Liquidity: Fund shares can be liquidated upon request any day that the stock market is open (most funds are priced once a day at 4:00 p.m. ET). Some funds even provide check writing and the ability to link directly with a checking account.


Convenience: Transactions for mutual funds can be done in writing, by phone and over the Internet.






No Guarantee: Unlike bank deposits and CDs, mutual funds are not insured or guaranteed by the FDIC. Money market mutual funds seek to maintain a stable share price; however, their yields may fluctuate. Stock and bond mutual funds may lose value.


Taxes: Since portfolio managers make the decisions to buy and sell securities, the fund's shareholders do not have control over when taxable transactions will occur for a particular fund. You may have to pay taxes for capital gains and/or income distributed by the fund during the course of the year.


Risk and Reward: The diversification that mutual funds provide can help reduce risk by offsetting losses from some securities with gains in other securities. However, this could limit the upside potential that is provided by owning a single security.




























Related Features













Find out which Prudential investment products and services meet your needs.




Managed Money  









Related Learning Guides













Go beyond the basics with more in-depth Learning Guides.




















Equities  

Fixed Income  

Mutual Funds  












0167357-00001-00










For Individuals & Families
Life Insurance

Term Life Insurance
Survivorship Life Insurance
Universal Life Insurance
Variable Life Insurance
Life Insurance Quote

Retirement

Annuities
Variable Annuities

Investments

Mutual Funds
Managed Accounts
Brokerage Accounts

Financial Planning

Guides, Calculators & Tutorials
Women & Money
The African American Financial Experience
The LGBT Financial Experience 
The Hispanic American Financial Experience





For Businesses & Organizations
Group Insurance

Group Life Insurance
Group Disability Insurance & Services

Retirement Services

Defined Contribution
Defined Benefit
Pension Risk Transfer Strategies
Guaranteed Retirement Income

Institutional Investments

Fundamental Equity
Quantitative Equity
Private Fixed Income
Fixed Income

Commercial Property

Real Estate Investing
Commercial Mortgages

Financial Institution Products



Sales Partner & Financial Professional Login

About Prudential
Customer Support
Careers
Find a Financial Professional
Sourcing & Procurement Information for Vendors
Misuse of Prudential name in fraud schemes 


Terms & Conditions
Privacy Statement
Important Notice for Illinois Customers
NY - Domestic Violence Notice
Business Integrity
HIPAA
Site map












Warning: Misuse of Prudential name in fraud schemes. Read more

Securities products and services are offered through: Pruco Securities, LLC, and Prudential Investment Management Services, LLC, both members SIPC and located in Newark, NJ, or Prudential Annuities Distributors, Inc., located in Shelton, CT. All are Prudential Financial companies. Prudential, the Prudential logo, the Rock Symbol and Bring Your Challenges are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide. Site for U.S. persons only.

Prudential Financial, its affiliates, and their financial professionals do not render tax or legal advice. Please consult with your tax and legal advisors regarding your personal circumstances.

Prudential Financial, Inc. of the United States is not affiliated with Prudential plc. which is headquartered in the United Kingdom.

Pruco Life Insurance Company, an Arizona company - California COA # 3637. The Prudential Insurance Company of America - California COA # 1179. Prudential Retirement Insurance and Annuity Company - California COA # 08003












Securities and Insurance Products:
Not Insured by FDIC or any Federal Government Agency   |   May Lose Value   |   Not a Deposit of or Guaranteed by the Bank or any Bank Affiliate  

Template:
0183077-00018-00
© 2017 Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities.



 











PBMXX Fund - Prudential Government Money Market Fund;A Overview - MarketWatch



























 













































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,796.55


85.54


0.39%











S&P 500

2,475.42


-2.41


-0.10%











Nasdaq

6,382.19


-40.56


-0.63%











GlobalDow

2,849.44


-1.64


-0.06%











Gold

1,265.40


-1.10


-0.09%











Oil

49.00


-0.04


-0.08%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ADP 
9.1




TSCO 
7.7




VZ 
7.7




ORLY 
7.4






CA
-10.2




JCI
-7.3




FFIV
-7.2




XL
-6.7














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








9:01p

Updated
Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’



8:31p

Amazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift



8:13p

Redfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation



8:05p

SpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round



7:14p

Headline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster



7:14p

Updated
Howard Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise



6:55p

Senate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote



6:46p

Updated
Scaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy



6:39p

Updated
Ethereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency



6:04p

This fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Mutual Funds


PBMXX


Overview



Compare Quotes
Fund Comparison
Market Screener
Mutual Fund Screener
Sectors

 



PBMXX
U.S.: Mutual Funds


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Prudential Government Money Market Fund;A

Watchlist 
CreatePBMXXAlert



  



Last Updated:  EDT



$
0.00



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$-





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  

   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Holdings


News


Charts


Historical Quotes



   




Key Data



52 Week Range




YTD
0.04%



5 Year
0.10%



Total Net Assets
$427.9M



Yield
0.04%



Net Expense Ratio
0.31%



Turnover %
N/A



52 Week Avg Return
0.05




 


Lipper Leader


YTD Lipper Ranking:Quintile 4 (68th percentile)
        


n/a
Total Returns


n/a
Consistent Return


n/a
Preservation


n/a
Tax Efficiency


n/a
Expense




Lipper Leaders Key


Highest
5
4
3
2
1
Lowest



  



Fund Details




Category
US Govt Money Mkt


Portfolio Style
US Govt Money Mkt


Fund Family
Prudential Cl A


Fund Status
Open


Fund Inception
June 1, 1976


Manager

Team Managed








Investment Policy


            
            The Fund seeks maximum current income consistent with stability of capital and the maintenance of liquidity. The Fund at least 99.5% of its total assets in cash, government securities, and/or repurchase agreements that are fully collaterized with cash or government securities.
            
            
            

 


Fees & Expenses




Front load
n/a


Deferred load
n/a


Max. redemption fee
n/a


Total expense ratio
0.31%


12 b-1
n/a


Turnover
n/a






Risk Measures




Alpha
0.00


Beta
0.00


Standard deviation
0.00


R. squared
0.00






Min. Investment




Standard (taxable)
$2,500


IRA
$1,000




 


Lipper Ranking & Performance










Fund Return
Category1
Index (Barclay US Agg)
% rank in category
Quintile rank




YTD
0.04%
0.11%
n/a
68%
4


1yr
0.05%
0.14%
n/a
68%
4


3yr2
0.03%
0.05%
n/a
51%
3


5yr2
0.02%
0.04%
n/a
55%
3


10yr2
0.50%
0.42%
n/a
17%
1





1US Govt MM Funds
23, 5 and 10 Year Returns are Annualized





Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available




No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News




No Headlines Available





  



Distributions




Income dividend
0.00


Dividend frequency
Daily


Capital gain (2016)
n/a


Capital gain (YTD)
n/a






Distribution History




Date
Income Distribution
Capital Gains Distribution




YTD
$0.00
-


2016
$0.00
-


2015
$0.00
-


2014
$0.00
-


2013
$0.00
-


2012
$0.00
-


2011
$0.00
-


2010
$0.00
-


2009
$0.00
-


2008
$0.02
-


2007
$0.05
-




 


Growth Of 10K




Starting Year:


2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009
2008
2007
2006
2005
2004
2003




Initial amount USD:


Calculate


Estimated Current USD Value






Fund Comparison




Tickers:
















Compare:


Returns
Risk
Fees
Holdings


Compare





Find Another Fund




Fund Type:


All Types
Growth
Value
Core
Mixed
Global
Sector
S&P 500
Fixed Income
Govt Debt



Net Assets:


All Ranges
Under $50 Million
$50 - $150 Million
$150 - $250 Million
$250 - $500 Million
Over $500 Million



Return:


1 Day
1 Week
4 Weeks
13 Weeks
Month To Date
Quarter To Date
Year To Date
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Quarter To Date
Since Inception


Show Funds



   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





AMZN

-0.65%








INTC

0.63%








SBUX

2.69%








BIDU

-0.08%








FSLR

-1.39%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Investing News - Investment Articles - Investing Research

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets




















  
      Investing
    





Mutual Funds »








What a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
              
              Oil companies are sounding a recurring theme: lower exploration and production spending estimates. Will that lead to a rally in oil prices?              
              
            

5:47 p.m.  Today5:47 p.m. July 27, 2017






Put your money where your mindset is
              
              Socially conscious mutual funds invest in ways that can be good for society and your portfolio.              
              
            

1:35 p.m.  Today1:35 p.m. July 27, 2017






How Venezuela chaos could spark oil rally OPEC has failed to achieve 
              
              Political and economic turmoil in Venezuela could fuel a rise in oil prices—something the Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries, despite it’s efforts to cut back production, hasn’t been able to do.              
              
            

2:07 p.m. July 26, 2017










Most popular funds ›


Fidelity Contra /quotes/zigman/226510/realtime
118.79
-0.56
-0.47%


Vanguard 500 Idx /quotes/zigman/245160/realtime
228.79
-0.20
-0.09%


CGM Tr Focus /quotes/zigman/188272/realtime
49.03
-0.60
-1.21%


Dodge Cox Stock /quotes/zigman/224556/realtime
195.36
-0.89
-0.45%


Fairholme /quotes/zigman/265845/realtime
20.48
-0.27
-1.30%


T. Rowe Price Eq Inc /quotes/zigman/240035/realtime
33.53
+0.02
+0.06%


USAA Metals Min /quotes/zigman/244622/realtime
12.81
-0.17
-1.31%








Exchange Traded Funds »








Traders Bet On Gold Miner Rally
              
              Traders Bet On Gold Miner Rally              
              
            

1:40 p.m.  Today1:40 p.m. July 27, 2017
(Benzinga.com)












SPY



							7/27/2017 6:30pm
					



SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust


/quotes/zigman/714403/composite

247.2


-0.23
-0.09%













Exchange traded funds ›


PowerShares QQQ /quotes/zigman/105934/composite
143.96
-0.91
-0.63%


iShares Russell 2000 /quotes/zigman/260873/composite
142.34
-0.91
-0.64%


Financial Sector SPDR /quotes/zigman/246222/composite
24.91
-0.14
-0.56%


Energy Sector SPDR /quotes/zigman/246199/composite
66.55
+0.67
+1.02%


iShares MSCI Em Mkt /quotes/zigman/322623/composite
43.77
-0.24
-0.55%







/conga/native_unit.html
370720





Stocks »







/conga/investing/stocks/main.html
1293






A quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
              
              Throughout 2017, there’s one acronym that investors have in particular been sinking their teeth into: FAANG.              
              
            

5:22 p.m.  Today5:22 p.m. July 27, 2017






Amazon earnings fall 77%, shares drop
              
              Amazon.com Inc.  reported much lower earnings than expected Thursday, and shares declined more than 2% in late trading. The e-commerce giant reported net income of $197 million, or 40 cents a share, on sales of $38 billion, a profit decline of 77% from the same quarter a year ago. Analysts on average expected Amazon to report earnings of $1.41 a share on sales of $37.2 billion. The company's spending cut into profit, as fulfillment costs -- the amount Amazon spends to fulfill customers' orders on its e-commerce platform -- rose about 33% from a year ago and spending on technology and content increased by about 43%. Amazon stock traded at all-time highs this week, making Amazon the fourth U.S. company with a market capitalization of $500 billion and briefly giving Chief Executive Jeff Bezos the title of richest man in the world, but shares declined about 2% in immediate after-hours action.              
              
            

5:00 p.m.  Today5:00 p.m. July 27, 2017










Most popular stocks  ›


BAC /quotes/zigman/190927/composite
24.11
-0.10
-0.41%


C /quotes/zigman/5065548/composite
67.60
-0.38
-0.56%


MSFT /quotes/zigman/20493/composite
73.16
-0.89
-1.20%


INTC /quotes/zigman/20392/composite
34.97
+0.22
+0.63%


CSCO /quotes/zigman/20039/composite
31.57
-0.09
-0.28%


F /quotes/zigman/264304/composite
11.18
+0.12
+1.08%


WFC /quotes/zigman/239557/composite
54.71
-0.20
-0.36%


JPM /quotes/zigman/272085/composite
91.55
-0.38
-0.41%








Bonds »








Profit-Taking Hits Global Stocks
              
              Asia-Pacific stock markets were hit by profit-taking Friday, after a strong week in the region and a selloff in U.S. tech stocks overnight.              
              
            

2 min ago10:54 p.m. July 27, 2017






The 3D Printing Metals Market Will Be Worth $12B in 2028 Forecasts New IDTechEx Research Report
              
              The 3D Printing Metals Market Will Be Worth $12B in 2028 Forecasts New IDTechEx Research Report              
              
            

9:01 p.m.  Today9:01 p.m. July 27, 2017












BX:TMUBMUSD03M



							7/27/2017 10:54pm
					



U.S. 3 Month Treasury Bill


/quotes/zigman/15866657/realtime

1.1106


+0.0050
+0.45%













Bonds ›


6 mo Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866663/realtime
1.14
-0.0026
-0.23%


2 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866656/realtime
1.36
-0.0080
-0.59%


5 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866662/realtime
1.84
-0.0082
-0.44%


10 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866666/realtime
2.30
-0.0098
-0.42%


30 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866668/realtime
2.91
-0.0094
-0.32%








Options »





				OPTIONS SCREENER |
				
				EXPIRATIONS |
				
				OPTIONS CHAINS |
				
				GETTING STARTED
/conga/mininav/investing-options.html
2543








Extremely low volatility could lead to a sharp, but short-lived, decline in stocks 
              
              Still, a chart of the S&P 500 reveals an undercurrent of bullishness, says Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

1:42 p.m. July 19, 2017






Who trades options the most? Millennial investors
              
              Millennials are frequently criticized by market experts for the way they invest—or, more accurately, the way they’re not investing—but recent research indicates that at least some young market participants are going about things in a more sophisticated way than they’re typically given credit for.              
              
            

1:32 p.m. May 24, 2017












VIX



							7/27/2017 3:14pm
					



CBOE Volatility Index


/quotes/zigman/2766221/delayed

10.11


+0.51
+5.31%













Options ›


SPX /quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42
-2.41
-0.10%


DJIA /quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55
+85.54
+0.39%


COMP /quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19
-40.56
-0.63%


RUT /quotes/zigman/2759624/delayed
1,433.62
-8.66
-0.60%


MID /quotes/zigman/6015543/delayed
1,771.02
-5.67
-0.32%








Currencies »








Dollar rises from 13-month low
              
              The U.S. dollar rises on Thursday, gaining against major rivals in what analysts suggest a mild consolidation following precipitous declines over recent weeks.               
              
            

2:41 p.m.  Today2:41 p.m. July 27, 2017






Donald Trump is winning the currency cold war: Pimco
              
              The Trump administration’s trade bullying “has killed the dollar bull,” says Pimco’s Joachim Fels.              
              
            

8:24 a.m.  Today8:24 a.m. July 27, 2017












USDJPY



							7/27/2017 10:56pm
					



Japanese Yen


/quotes/zigman/16008150/realtime/sampled

111.097


-0.1620
-0.1456%













One U.S. Dollar Buys ›


British Pound /quotes/zigman/16008140/realtime/sampled
1.3085
+0.0019
+0.1454%


Brazilian Real /quotes/zigman/15936989/realtime/sampled
3.1541
+0.0037
+0.1174%








Commodities »






Rocket Maker SpaceX’s Valuation Soars to $21 Billion 
              
              SpaceX has raised as much as $350 million in a new round of financing that boosted the company’s valuation, a vote of confidence for founder Elon Musk who is seeking to prove the rocket maker can become a major satellite operator.               
              
            

54 min ago10:02 p.m. July 27, 2017










Commodities  ›


Brent Crude /quotes/zigman/18185161/delayed
51.43
-0.06
-0.12%


Heating Oil /quotes/zigman/25024089/delayed
1.60
-0.0027
-0.17%


Natural Gas /quotes/zigman/2306589/delayed
2.96
-0.0050
-0.17%


Gold /quotes/zigman/7730417/delayed
1,265.40
-1.10
-0.09%


Silver /quotes/zigman/60158948/delayed
16.55
-0.02
-0.14%


Platinum /quotes/zigman/74312941/delayed
929.00
+2.60
+0.28%


Corn /quotes/zigman/25518705/delayed
387.50
-0.25
-0.06%

















Most Popular





1.





Market Extra

President Donald Trump is set to unleash a cascade of stock-market anxiety






2.





Market Snapshot

Dow posts worst losing streak in 2 months on eve of Trump’s inauguration






3.





Howard Gold's No-Nonsense Investing

Fund manager who correctly predicted 2014 drop in oil now sees prices in the $30s






4.






My dad talked me out of the decade’s best investment, but he wasn’t wrong






5.





SectorWatch

What Trump's vow to repeal Dodd-Frank means for banks








Stock Screener »


Find your top stocks

		Identify stocks based on criteria that you select, such as price 
		movement, volume, fundamentals, technical behavior and industry. 








/conga/tools/stock-screener.html
2585








Find a Broker

Partner Center »

















            SPONSORED SECTIONS
    


Compare current broker offers 













Log In




10:56 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:01pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
8:32pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
8:14pRedfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation
8:06pSpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round
7:15pHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
7:14pHeadline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster
6:55pSenate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote
6:47pScaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy
6:39pEthereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency
6:04pThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
6:03pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
5:48pTesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
5:48pWhat a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
5:43pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
5:33pBitcoin investors: things may get very ugly soon, if this chart overlay is right
5:33pBaidu ADRs rally 7% after earnings beat
5:30pBREAKINGSenators demand House conference promise before voting on 'skinny' Obamacare repeal
5:27pJonathan Golub leaves RBC to head equities strategy at Credit Suisse: report
5:23pAmazon earnings forecast shows spending expected to continue
5:22pA quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55

+85.54
+0.39%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19

-40.56
-0.63%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42

-2.41
-0.10%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15





















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




10:56 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:01pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
8:32pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
8:14pRedfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation
8:06pSpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round
7:15pHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
7:14pHeadline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster
6:55pSenate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote
6:47pScaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy
6:39pEthereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency
6:04pThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
6:03pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
5:48pTesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
5:48pWhat a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
5:43pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
5:33pBitcoin investors: things may get very ugly soon, if this chart overlay is right
5:33pBaidu ADRs rally 7% after earnings beat
5:30pBREAKINGSenators demand House conference promise before voting on 'skinny' Obamacare repeal
5:27pJonathan Golub leaves RBC to head equities strategy at Credit Suisse: report
5:23pAmazon earnings forecast shows spending expected to continue
5:22pA quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55

+85.54
+0.39%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19

-40.56
-0.63%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42

-2.41
-0.10%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Funds/A Z Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Funds A-Z


0-9A (current)BCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

AAM S - AB GrAB Gr - AB MuAB Mu - AberdAberd - ACR MActiv - AdvisAdvis - AdvisAdvis - AdvisAdvis - AdvisAdvis - AlgerAlger - AlliaAllia - AlliaAllia - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmeriAmeri - AmundAmund - AmundAmund - AmundAmund - AQR MAQR M - ArrowArrow - AustrAustr - Azzad



Name
Country
Exchange
Sector




AAM Select Income Fund;A (CPUAX)
United States
XNAS



AAM Select Income Fund;C (CPUCX)
United States
XNAS



AAM Select Income Fund;I (CPUIX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/Bahl & Gaynor Income Growth Fund;A (AFNAX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/Bahl & Gaynor Income Growth Fund;C (AFYCX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/Bahl & Gaynor Income Growth Fund;I (AFNIX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/HIMCO Short Duration Fund;A (ASDAX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/HIMCO Short Duration Fund;C (ASDCX)
United States
XNAS



AAM/HIMCO Short Duration Fund;I (ASDIX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Alternative Return Portfolio;A (AARAX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Alternative Return Portfolio;Advisor (AARYX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Alternative Return Portfolio;C (AARCX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Income Portfolio;A (MRKAX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Income Portfolio;Advisor (MRKYX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Income Portfolio;C (MRKCX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;1 (AMTOX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;2 (AMTTX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;A (AMTAX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;Advisor (AMTYX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;C (ACMTX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;I (AMTIX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;K (AMTKX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;R (AMTRX)
United States
XNAS



AB All Market Real Return Portfolio;Z (AMTZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Arizona Portfolio;A (AAZAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Arizona Portfolio;B (AAZBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Arizona Portfolio;C (AAZCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Asia ex-Japan Equity Portfolio;A (AXJAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Asia ex-Japan Equity Portfolio;Advisor (AXJYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Asia ex-Japan Equity Portfolio;C (AXJCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;A (ABWAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;Advisor (ABWYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;B (ABWBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;C (ABWCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;I (ABWIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;K (ABWKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Balanced Wealth Strategy;R (ABWRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;1 (ABNOX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;2 (ABNTX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;A (ABNAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;Advisor (ABNYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;C (ABNCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;I (ANBIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;K (ABNKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;R (ABNRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Bond Inflation Strategy;Z (ABNZX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;A (ALCAX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;Advisor (ALCVX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;B (ALCBX)
United States
XNAS



AB California Portfolio;C (ACACX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;A (WPASX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;Advisor (WPSGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;C (WPCSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;I (WPSIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;K (WPSKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;R (WPRSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated Growth Fund;Z (WPSZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated International Growth Portfolio;A (CIAGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated International Growth Portfolio;Advisor (CIGYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Concentrated International Growth Portfolio;C (CICGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;A (ABPAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;Advisor (ABPYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;B (ABPBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;C (ABPCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;I (APWIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;K (APWKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Conservative Wealth Strategy;R (APPRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;A (ADGAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;Advisor (ADGYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;B (ADGBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;C (ADGCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;I (ADGIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;K (ADGKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;R (ADGRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Core Opportunities Fund;Z (ADGZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Corporate Income Shares (ACISX)
United States
XNAS



AB Credit Long/Short Portfolio;A (ALASX)
United States
XNAS



AB Credit Long/Short Portfolio;Advisor (ALYSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Credit Long/Short Portfolio;C (ALCSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;A (CHCLX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;Adv (CHCYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;B (CHCBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;C (CHCCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;I (CHCIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;K (CHCKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;R (CHCRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Growth Fund;Z (CHCZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;A (ABASX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;Advisor (ABYSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;B (ABBSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;C (ABCSX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;I (ABSIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;K (ABSKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;R (ABSRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Discovery Value Fund;Z (ABSZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Core Portfolio;A (EMPAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Core Portfolio;Advisor (EMPYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Core Portfolio;C (EMPCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Growth Portfolio;A (EGPAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Growth Portfolio;Adv (EGPYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Growth Portfolio;C (EGPCX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;A (ABAEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;Adv (ABYEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;C (ABCEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;I (ABIEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;K (ABKEX)
United States
XNAS



AB Emerging Markets Multi-Asset Portfolio;R (ABREX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;A (AUIAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;Advisor (AUIYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;B (AUIBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;C (AUICX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;I (AUIIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;K (AUIKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;R (AUIRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Equity Income Fund;Z (AUIZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;A (ANAGX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;Adv (ANAYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;B (ANABX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;C (ANACX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;I (ANAIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;K (ANAKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;R (ANARX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Bond Fund;Z (ANAZX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Core Equity Portfolio;A (GCEAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Core Equity Portfolio;Adv (GCEYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Core Equity Portfolio;C (GCECX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund II;I (ARIIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;A (AREAX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;Advisor (ARSYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;B (AREBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;C (ARECX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;I (AEEIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;K (ARRKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Real Estate Investment Fund;R (ARRRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;A (CABNX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;Advisor (CBSYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;B (CABBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;C (CBACX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;I (CABIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;K (CBSKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Risk Allocation Fund;R (CBSRX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;A (ALTFX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;Advisor (ATEYX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;B (ATEBX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;C (ATECX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;I (AGTIX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;K (ATEKX)
United States
XNAS



AB Global Thematic Growth Fund;R (ATERX)
United States
XNAS



AB Government Money Market Portfolio;Inst (GMOXX)
United States
XNAS



AB Growth & Income Fund;A (CABDX)
United States
XNAS




«1234567891011-2021-29»










Log In




10:56 PM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:01pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
8:32pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
8:14pRedfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation
8:06pSpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round
7:15pHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
7:14pHeadline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster
6:55pSenate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote
6:47pScaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy
6:39pEthereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency
6:04pThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
6:03pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
5:48pTesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
5:48pWhat a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
5:43pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
5:33pBitcoin investors: things may get very ugly soon, if this chart overlay is right
5:33pBaidu ADRs rally 7% after earnings beat
5:30pBREAKINGSenators demand House conference promise before voting on 'skinny' Obamacare repeal
5:27pJonathan Golub leaves RBC to head equities strategy at Credit Suisse: report
5:23pAmazon earnings forecast shows spending expected to continue
5:22pA quarter of S&P 500’s 2017 climb due to five stocks (yes, those five)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,796.55

+85.54
+0.39%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,382.19

-40.56
-0.63%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,475.42

-2.41
-0.10%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































PBMXX Fund - Prudential Government Money Market Fund;A Overview - MarketWatch



























 













































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,796.55


85.54


0.39%











S&P 500

2,475.42


-2.41


-0.10%











Nasdaq

6,382.19


-40.56


-0.63%











GlobalDow

2,849.44


-1.64


-0.06%











Gold

1,265.40


-1.10


-0.09%











Oil

48.99


-0.05


-0.10%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



ADP 
9.1




TSCO 
7.7




VZ 
7.7




ORLY 
7.4






CA
-10.2




JCI
-7.3




FFIV
-7.2




XL
-6.7














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








9:01p

Updated
Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’



8:31p

Amazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift



8:13p

Redfin prices IPO higher than expected for $1.2 billion valuation



8:05p

SpaceX valuation jumps to $21 billion on new financing round



7:14p

Headline: Sen. Graham: The 'Skinny' Bill Is a Disaster



7:14p

Updated
Howard Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise



6:55p

Senate passes Russia sanctions bill on 98-2 vote



6:46p

Updated
Scaramucci provides a shocking Bannon comparison that defies anatomy



6:39p

Updated
Ethereum struggles to rise as regulatory scrutiny weighs on digital currency



6:04p

This fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Mutual Funds


PBMXX


Overview



Compare Quotes
Fund Comparison
Market Screener
Mutual Fund Screener
Sectors

 



PBMXX
U.S.: Mutual Funds


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Prudential Government Money Market Fund;A

Watchlist 
CreatePBMXXAlert



  



Last Updated:  EDT



$
0.00



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$-





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  

   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Holdings


News


Charts


Historical Quotes



   




Key Data



52 Week Range




YTD
0.04%



5 Year
0.10%



Total Net Assets
$427.9M



Yield
0.04%



Net Expense Ratio
0.31%



Turnover %
N/A



52 Week Avg Return
0.05




 


Lipper Leader


YTD Lipper Ranking:Quintile 4 (68th percentile)
        


n/a
Total Returns


n/a
Consistent Return


n/a
Preservation


n/a
Tax Efficiency


n/a
Expense




Lipper Leaders Key


Highest
5
4
3
2
1
Lowest



  



Fund Details




Category
US Govt Money Mkt


Portfolio Style
US Govt Money Mkt


Fund Family
Prudential Cl A


Fund Status
Open


Fund Inception
June 1, 1976


Manager

Team Managed








Investment Policy


            
            The Fund seeks maximum current income consistent with stability of capital and the maintenance of liquidity. The Fund at least 99.5% of its total assets in cash, government securities, and/or repurchase agreements that are fully collaterized with cash or government securities.
            
            
            

 


Fees & Expenses




Front load
n/a


Deferred load
n/a


Max. redemption fee
n/a


Total expense ratio
0.31%


12 b-1
n/a


Turnover
n/a






Risk Measures




Alpha
0.00


Beta
0.00


Standard deviation
0.00


R. squared
0.00






Min. Investment




Standard (taxable)
$2,500


IRA
$1,000




 


Lipper Ranking & Performance










Fund Return
Category1
Index (Barclay US Agg)
% rank in category
Quintile rank




YTD
0.04%
0.11%
n/a
68%
4


1yr
0.05%
0.14%
n/a
68%
4


3yr2
0.03%
0.05%
n/a
51%
3


5yr2
0.02%
0.04%
n/a
55%
3


10yr2
0.50%
0.42%
n/a
17%
1





1US Govt MM Funds
23, 5 and 10 Year Returns are Annualized





Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available




No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News




No Headlines Available





  



Distributions




Income dividend
0.00


Dividend frequency
Daily


Capital gain (2016)
n/a


Capital gain (YTD)
n/a






Distribution History




Date
Income Distribution
Capital Gains Distribution




YTD
$0.00
-


2016
$0.00
-


2015
$0.00
-


2014
$0.00
-


2013
$0.00
-


2012
$0.00
-


2011
$0.00
-


2010
$0.00
-


2009
$0.00
-


2008
$0.02
-


2007
$0.05
-




 


Growth Of 10K




Starting Year:


2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009
2008
2007
2006
2005
2004
2003




Initial amount USD:


Calculate


Estimated Current USD Value






Fund Comparison




Tickers:
















Compare:


Returns
Risk
Fees
Holdings


Compare





Find Another Fund




Fund Type:


All Types
Growth
Value
Core
Mixed
Global
Sector
S&P 500
Fixed Income
Govt Debt



Net Assets:


All Ranges
Under $50 Million
$50 - $150 Million
$150 - $250 Million
$250 - $500 Million
Over $500 Million



Return:


1 Day
1 Week
4 Weeks
13 Weeks
Month To Date
Quarter To Date
Year To Date
1 Year
3 Years
5 Years
10 Years
Quarter To Date
Since Inception


Show Funds



   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





AMZN

-0.65%








INTC

0.63%








SBUX

2.69%








BIDU

-0.08%








FSLR

-1.39%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.














MJAXX Prudential Government Money Market Fund Class Exchange A money market fund, quote, price - Morningstar

























Welcome!















Company News
Company Site
Premium
Log In


 



















Membership
Home
Portfolio
Stocks
Bonds
Funds
ETFs
CEF
Markets
Tools
Real Life Finance
Discuss





Investing Ideas


Fund Analyst Picks
Picks by Category
Fund Pick Performance
Picks & Pans E-Newsletter
Fund Spy Column
Fund Spy Book
Bond Squad
Fund Video Reports
FundInvestor Newsletter
ETF Investing
Fund Family Experts



Fund Reports


All Fund Analyst Reports
Fund Stewardship Reports



Fund Ratings


Highest-Rated Value
Highest-Rated Growth
Highest-Rated Large-Cap
Highest-Rated Mid-Cap
Highest-Rated Small-Cap
Foreign Fund Standouts
Star Rating Performance
Rating Methodology



Fund Performance


Top 1-Month Performers
Top YTD Performers
Top 1-Year Performers
Top 3-Year Performers
Top 5-Year Performers
Fund Category Returns
Biggest Daily NAV Changes
Closed-End Funds
Exchange-Traded Funds
Quarterly Market Outlook



Fund Screeners


Basic Screeners
Fund Screener
Long-Term Winners
Solid Small-Growth Funds
Conservative Bond Funds

Premium Screeners
Premium Fund Screener
Index Funds
Hidden Gems
Lower-Risk Foreign Funds


Video Center
 
 

 










Prudential Government Money Market Fund Class Exchange A
 MJAXX


Fund Family DataAdd to PortfolioGet E-mail AlertsPrint This PageData DefinitionData QuestionQuoteChartDistributionPerformanceRatings & RiskManagementPortfolioExpenseTaxPurchase








Growth of 10K
 MJAXX
More...










Top Holdings
 MJAXX
More...







Top Sectors
 MJAXX
More...







Dividend and Capital Gains Distributions
 MJAXX
More...





S&P 500 index data: S&P 500 Copyright © 
    	

All data supplied by Morningstar Real-Time Data. U.S. intraday real-time exchange quotes are sourced from BATS when available. End-of-day quotes for Nasdaq, NYSE, and Amex securities will appear 15 minutes after close. Graph times are Eastern Standard. © Copyright  Morningstar, Inc. 



















Style Map
 MJAXX
More...







Asset Allocation
 MJAXX
More...





















 


Site Directory
Site Map
Our Products












 



 



 




Corrections
Help
Advertising Opportunities
Licensing Opportunities
Glossary
RSS
Mobile Portfolio
Affiliate
Careers 
 


International Sites:
        	Australia
Canada
China
France
Germany
Hong Kong
Italy
The Netherlands
Norway
Spain
U.K.
Switzerland

 




Stocks by:
            Name
|
Ticker
|
Star Rating
|
Market Cap
|
Stock Type
|
Sector
|
Industry



Mutual Funds by:
            Star Rating
|
Investment Style
|
Total Assets
|
Category
|
Top Holdings
|
Top Sectors
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



ETFs by:
            Star Rating
|
Category
|
Total Assets
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Articles by:
            Title
|
Date
|
Author
|
Collection
|
Interest
|
Popularity



Investment Categories by:
            Topic
|
Sector
|
Key Indicators
|
User Interest
|
Market Cap
|
Industry



Premium Stocks by:
            Name
|
Ticker
|
Star Rating
|
Market Cap
|
Stock Type
|
Sector
|
Industry



Premium Mutual Funds by:
            Star Rating
|
Investment Style
|
Total Assets
|
Category
|
Top Holdings
|
Top Sectors
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Premium ETFs by:
            Star Rating
|
Category
|
Total Assets
|
Symbol / Ticker
|
Name



Popular Articles by:
            Title
|
Date
|
Author
|
Collection
|
Interest
|
Popularity



Popular Investment Categories by:
            Topic
|
Sector
|
Key Indicators
|
User Interest
|
Market Cap
|
Industry




Independent. Insightful. Trusted. Morningstar provides stock market analysis; equity, mutual fund, and ETF research, ratings, and picks; portfolio tools; and option, hedge fund, IRA, 401k, and 529 plan research. Our reliable data and analysis can help both experienced enthusiasts and newcomers.
        © Copyright  Morningstar, Inc. All rights reserved. Please read our Terms of Useand Privacy Policy.Dow Jones Industrial Average, S&P 500, Nasdaq, and Morningstar Index (Market Barometer) quotes are real-time. Russell 2000 quote is 10 minutes delayed.
 


 
















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Government Money Fund (PRRXX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Government Money Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				PRRXX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments








			
				Formerly T. Rowe Price Prime Reserve Fund
				
				
				
			
			


 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/27/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
							$1.0000
						  
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
							$0.0000
						  
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/27/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								0.19%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
							
								$1.0000
							
							-
							
								$1.0000
							
						  
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$7,879.79

					
					Million
				



Important money market information: Click here for NAV Type, Liquidity Fees & Redemption Gates, Daily & Weekly liquid asset levels, Holdings, Market-based NAV and Net Shareholder flows.

						Effective August 1, 2016, Prime Reserve Fund, changed to a government mandate and was 
renamed Government Money Fund. The performance for the periods prior to August 1, 2016 
reflects the performance of the fund when it operated as a prime money market fund and 
invested in certain types of securities that it is no longer permitted to hold. 
Performance prior to this conversion may have been different if the current investment 
limitations had been in effect.
						




Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions


Average Annual Total Returns 1



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					0.16%
				
			

				
					0.16%
				
			


3 Years

				
					0.06%
				
			

				
					0.06%
				
			


5 Years

				
					0.04%
				
			

				
					0.04%
				
			


10 Years

				
					0.53%
				
			

				
					0.53%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 4.88%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							4.88%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							January 26, 1976
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.48%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.44%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, 
which cannot guarantee future results. Return and yield will vary.

 
    
You could lose money by investing in the Fund. 
Although the Fund seeks to preserve the value of your investment at $1.00 per share, it cannot guarantee 
it will do so. An investment in the Fund is not insured or guaranteed by the 
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. The Fund's 
sponsor has no legal obligation to provide financial support to the Fund, and 
you should not expect that the sponsor will provide financial support to the 
Fund at any time.
    
    





^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

1Average annual total return figures include reinvested dividends and capital gain distributions.
		



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund's goals are preservation of capital, liquidity, and, consistent with these, the highest possible current income.
		
7-Day Annualized Yield2
 as of 
				
				    07/27/2017
				
			



Simple3

						 
							0.64%
						
					


Simple w/o Waiver

						 
							0.46%
						
					


Compound3

						 
							0.64%
						
					


Compound w/o Waiver

						 
							0.46%
						
					



2
								
				
				A method of calculating a money fund's yield by annualizing the 
fund's net investment income for the last seven days of each period 
divided by the fund's net asset value at the end of the period. 
				
3
									
					
					In an effort to maintain a zero or positive net yield for the fund, T. Rowe Price has voluntarily waived all or a portion of the management fee it is entitled to receive from the fund. A fee waiver has the effect of increasing the fund's net yield. The 7-day yield without waiver represents what the yield would have been if we were not waiving our management fee. This voluntary waiver is in addition to any contractual expense ratio limitation in effect for the fund and may be amended or terminated at any time without prior notice. Please see the prospectus for more details. 
					
				
				Year-to-date figures are not annualized and represent total return, 
which includes reinvested distributions (income and capital gains) 
and any change in share price for the given period. The yield quotation 
more closely reflects the current earnings of the money market fund than the total return quotation.
			


























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual  fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- & 5-Star Rated Funds | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















85% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 6/30/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Personal Finance





Summer 2017 Issue: T. Rowe Price Report

July 20, 2017









Personal Finance





Top 10 Financial To-Dos for Recent College Grads

July 19, 2017









Fixed Income





Finding Opportunities in High Yield Markets

July 18, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*157 of our 332 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 134 of these 157 (85%) funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 215 of 317 (68%), 183 of 225 (81%), 149 of 180 (83%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
36 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes). 34 of these 36 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 38 of 39, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 162 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 6/30/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now


































 








About Us | PGIMInvestments



















About Us
www.pgim.com


en


mtQH46Oni5lSYsO9tnp6xJY

Asset Management


Skip to main content















 PGIM.com


 PGIM Businesses






 Financial Professional Login


 Customer Login


 Careers


 Contact













Menu



Close






PGIM Home







About Us
 About Us


 Products


 Insights


 Overview


 Fixed Income


 Income Investing




 Resources






Close














{}








Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRJVO5







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 






































We help investors participate in global market opportunities
At PGIM Investments, we consider it a great privilege and responsibility to help investors participate in opportunities across global markets while meeting their toughest investment challenges. We’re part of PGIM, the 9th-largest investment manager globally1 with more than $1 trillion in assets under management.2



















































 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB0S0







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























		
			PGIM Investments At a Glance
		
	
Through our diversified fund line up and consistent outperformance, PGIM Investments ranks among the top five fastest organically growing U.S. mutual fund firms.3












 


Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB0U4







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 










































80% of z-class funds outperformed their Morningstar category median over the 10-year period ended March 31, 2017.4






























90% of our fixed income funds outperformed their Morningstar category median over their 10-year period.5






























We offer a diversified suite of actively managed funds across a broad spectrum of asset classes and investment styles.























 


Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBGO3







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























		
			Bringing You the Investment Managers of Prudential
		
	
We are part of PGIM, the global investment management business of Prudential Financial, a company that individuals and businesses have trusted with their financial future for over 140 years.












 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBGQ5







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 








































PGIM is the 9th largest asset manager in the world1


Manages assets for 142 of the top 300 Global Pension Funds6


Manages assets for 18 of the largest 25 public U.S. Pension Plans7 




























More than $1 trillion in assets under management2


Manages assets for 23 of the largest 25 corporate U.S. Pension Plans7


Global presence with offices in 16 countries2

























 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBG71







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























		
			Focused on Delivering Long-term Results
		
	












 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB846







AdvisorFundTrackerTable



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 













    Our Top Performing Funds
      





Morningstar Overall Ratings for Class Z shares as of {{fundDate}}


Fund Name
OVERALL RATING
3-YEAR
5-YEAR
10-YEAR




{{fund.fundName}}opens in a new window ({{fund.code}})
               Rating: ({{fund.category}})


{{fund.overallRating}} star fund rating 


{{fund.overallFunds}} Funds
 -



{{fund.3yearRating}} star fund rating 


 {{fund.3yearFunds}} Funds
 -



{{fund.5yearRating}} star fund rating 


 {{fund.5yearFunds}} Funds
 -



{{fund.10yearRating}} star fund rating 


 {{fund.10yearFunds}} Funds
 -











 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRB845







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























Meet the Managers Behind our Star Performing Funds

Our asset managers are committed to a long-term approach to investing. That’s because they also manage money for major corporations and pension funds around the world who measure investment success over decades, not quarters. It means individual investors benefit from the same focus, expertise, innovation, and attention to risk demanded by today’s most sophisticated investors. PGIM assets under management data as of 3/31/2017.












 

Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVH4L7







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 


































One of the largest and most experienced fixed-income managers in the industry.
 




Assets
$653.6 Billion


Established
1928












Global leader in public and private real estate investments with deep knowledge of local and regional markets.




Assets
$65.9 Billion


Established
1970












Leading fundamental equity manager featuring growth, value, blend, global and specialty strategies.




Assets
$164.3 Billion


Established
1969












Leader in developing innovative equity and asset allocation strategies to help meet a broad range of investment objectives.




Assets
$120.5 Billion


Established
1975
















Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVHCT7







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























					
					
						Recent Awards & Recognition
					
				












	
		LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Utility Fund (Class Z)


















LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Utility Fund (Class Z)







#1 Utility Fund (Class Z)
Prudential Jennison Utility Fund is recognized as a 2017 Lipper Fund Award winner for leading the utility category over the 5-year period
















	
		ALERIAN  MLP Mutual Fund of the Year


















ALERIAN  MLP Mutual Fund of the Year







MLP Mutual Fund of the Year
Prudential Jennison MLP Fund is recognized as a 2017 Ammy Award winner for being the MLP mutual fund that generated the highest total return of 17 funds in 2016.

















	
		LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Income Fund (Class Z)


















LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Income Fund (Class Z)







#1 Global Income Fund (Class Z)
Prudential Global Total Return Fund, Inc. is recognized as a 2016 Lipper Fund Award winner for leading the global income category over the 10-year period.
















	
		LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z)


















LIPPER FUND AWARDS  #1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z)







#1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z)
Prudential Global Real Estate Fund is recognized as a 2016 Lipper Fund Award winner for leading the global real estate category over the 10-year period.

















































































 

Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVH2M7







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 

























Spotlight













 

Z7_K8HEHHG0LGC350AB2NLMCVH2L3







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 


























	
	
		What's New
	
	













 
			
			
				What's New
			 
		






Check out our new Family of Funds Brochure featuring PGIM Investments' key attributes, investment experience, and diversified suite of funds.








 Download the Family of Funds Brochure  PDF opens in a new window









	
	
		The Active/Passive Choice
	
	













 
			
			
				The Active/Passive Choice
			 
		






As passive management gains traction, what is the impact on investors?  Richard Woodworth, VP Product Management explains why choice is good for investors.














	
	
		Newsroom
	
	













 
			
			
				Newsroom
			 
		






View our latest press releases and announcements.








 Read the latest PGIM Investments News 


















 

Z7_K8HEHHG0L03280AB2N8TDRBKS3







Web Content Viewer



Component Action Menu





${title}


 
${loading}













Actions



 













1. Pensions & Investments: Largest Money Manager list, May 2017, data as of 12/31/2016.
2. PGIM data, as of 3/31/17.
3. Simfund, as of 3/31/17 among top 50 competitors between 2008 and 1Q2017, excludes ETFs and money market funds.
4. 28 out of 35 funds. Ranking based on Class Z share funds with 10-year history. Rankings for Class Z share funds that rank top 50% or better within their respective Morningstar Categories over the trailing 1-, 3-, & 5-year periods are 31/56 funds, 29/48 funds, and 25/42 funds, respectively. Source: Morningstar as of 3/31/17.
5. 9 out of 10 fixed income funds. Ranking based on Class Z share fixed income funds with 10-year history. Rankings for Class Z share fixed income funds that rank top 50% or better within their respective Morningstar Categories over the trailing 1-, 3-, & 5-year periods are 12/18 funds, 14/15 funds, and 11/13 funds, respectively. Source: Morningstar as of 3/31/17.
6. P&I/Towers Watson Top 300 Pension Funds ranking as of 12/31/16, published 9/30/16.
7. Based on U.S. Plan Sponsor rankings in Pensions & Investments as of 12/31/16.
Morningstar rankings are based on total return, do not include the effects of sales charges, and are calculated against all funds in each fund's respective Morningstar category. Past performance does not guarantee future results. Performance by share class may vary.
Star ratings shown are for Class Z shares, which are available to individual investors through certain retirement and wrap fee programs, and to institutions at an investment minimum of $5,000,000. Performance by share class may vary. In addition to the ones shown above, other classes, which contain either a sales load or a contingent deferred sales charge, are also available. These expenses will generally lower total fund return. Please see the prospectus for additional information about fees, expenses and investor eligibility requirements.
The risks associated with investing in these funds include but are not limited to: derivative securities, which may carry market, credit, and liquidity risks; short sales, which involve costs and the risk of potentially unlimited losses; leveraging, which may magnify losses; high yield (“junk”) bonds, which are subject to greater market risks; small/mid cap stocks which may be subject to more erratic market movements than large cap stocks; foreign securities, which are subject to currency fluctuation and political uncertainty; real estate, which poses certain risks related to overall and specific economic conditions as well as risks related to individual property, credit and interest-rate fluctuations; and mortgage-backed securities, which are subject to prepayment and extension risks. Sector funds and Specialty funds may not be suitable for all investors. Such funds are non-diversified, so a loss resulting from a particular security will have greater impact on the Fund's return. Fixed income investments are subject to interest rate risk, and their value will decline as interest rates rise. The risks associated with each fund are explained more fully in each fund's respective prospectus. There is no guarantee a fund's objectives will be achieved.
Some Morningstar Ratings may not be customarily based on adjusted historical returns. If so, an investment's independent Morningstar Rating metric is compared against the retail mutual fund universe breakpoints to determine its hypothetical rating for certain time periods. The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.
For the overall, 3-, 5- and 10-year periods, respectively, as of 3/31/17: Prudential Balanced Fund was rated 5 stars out of 721 funds, 5 stars out of 721 funds, and 5 stars out of 616 funds, and 4 out of 424 funds, respectively; Prudential High Yield Fund was rated 5 stars out of 596 funds, 5 stars out of 596 funds, 4 stars out of 471 funds, and 5 stars out of 318 funds, respectively; Prudential Short-Term Corporate Bond Fund, Inc. was rated 5 stars out of 444 funds, 4 stars out of 444 funds, 4 stars out of 359 funds, and 5 stars out of 257 funds, respectively; Prudential Total Return Bond Fund was rated 5 stars out of 851 funds, 5 stars out of 851 funds, 5 stars out of 750 funds, and 5 stars out of 538 funds, respectively; Prudential California Municipal Income Fund was rated 5 stars out of 69 funds, 5 stars out of 69 funds, 5 stars out of 65 funds, and 5 stars out of 52 funds, respectively; Prudential National Muni Fund was rated 5 stars out of 256 funds, 5 stars out of 256 funds, 5 stars out of 224 funds, and 5 stars out of 150 funds, respectively; Prudential QMA Small-Cap Value Fund was rated 5 stars out of 353 funds, 5 stars out of 353 funds, 4 stars out of 309 funds, and 5 stars out of 199 funds, respectively; Prudential Short Duration Multi-Sector Bond Fund was rated 5 stars out of 444 funds, and 5 stars out of 444 funds, respectively.
© 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All rights reserved. The information contained herein (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete, or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information.
In the Lipper Fund Awards, funds had to be registered for sale in the respective country as of the end of 2015 and 2016 and the fund had to have at least 36 months of performance history as of the end of the evaluation year. S&P 500 Index funds, specialty diversified equity funds and specialty/miscellaneous funds were not eligible to receive classification awards. Rankings do not take sales charges into account. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
The Lipper Fund Awards are based on risk-adjusted returns for the three-, five-, and 10-year periods ending 11/30/2015 and 11/30/2016 using Lipper's proprietary, quantitative fund rating methodology.
The Lipper Fund Awards are based on risk-adjusted returns for the three-, five-, and 10-year periods ending 11/30/2016 using Lipper's proprietary, quantitative fund rating methodology. Prudential Jennison Utility Fund- #1 Utility Fund (Class Z) out of 47 funds for the 5-year period ended 11/30/2016. Rankings for the 3- and 10-year periods were 16 out of 49 and 16 out of 44 funds, respectively. Prudential Global Total Return - #1 Global Income Fund (Class Z) out of 76 funds for the 10-year period ended 11/30/2015. Rankings for the 3- and 5-year periods were 72 out of 182 and 28 out of 130 funds, respectively. Prudential Global Real Estate Fund: #1 Global Real Estate Fund (Class Z) out of 32 funds for the 10-year period ended 11/30/2015. Rankings for the 3- and 5-year periods were 40 out of 113 and 20 out of 94 funds, respectively.
From Thomson Reuters Lipper Awards, © 2017 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Used by permission and protected by the Copyright Laws of the United States. The printing, copying, redistribution, or retransmission of this Content without express written permission is prohibited.
The Ammys 2017 MLP Mutual Fund of the Year Award. Awarded to the MLP mutual fund that generated the highest total return of 17 funds in 2016. MLP mutual fund is defined as a mutual fund whose principal investment objective is to invest the majority of fund assets in MLPs, and by definition, making a corporate tax election. Total return is calculated using the fund’s Class A shares, adding any dividends paid during the year to the price return. As a viability threshold, the fund must have at least $100 million in assets. Leveraged versions of other mutual funds are not eligible. There are a total of 17 MLP mutual funds in the peer group, one of which was ineligible for utilizing leverage.
Alerian and its affiliates do not endorse, manage, promote, sell, or sponsor any company, investment fund or other vehicle nominated, selected as a finalist, or selected as a winner for the Alerian MLP Awards, or Ammys. Alerian is not an investment advisor, and Alerian and its affiliates make no representations regarding the advisability of investing in any company, investment fund or other vehicle nominated, selected as a finalist, or selected as a winner for the Ammys.
Consider a fund's investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. The prospectus Opens in a new window and the summary prospectus contain this and other information about the fund. Contact your financial professional for a prospectus and the summary prospectus. Read them carefully before investing.
An investment in our money market funds is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. Although the funds seek to preserve the value of your clients investment at $1.00 per share, it is possible to lose money by investing in the funds.
Mutual fund investing involves risk. Some mutual funds have more risk than others. The investment return and principal value will fluctuate and investor's shares when sold may be worth more or less than the original cost. Fixed income investments are subject to interest rate risk, and their value will decline as interest rates rise. Asset allocation and diversification do not assure a profit or protect against loss in declining markets. There is no guarantee a Fund's objectives will be achieved. The risks associated with each fund are explained more fully in each fund's respective prospectus. Your clients should consult with their attorney, accountant, and/or tax professional for advice concerning their particular situation.
These materials are for informational or educational purposes only. The information is not intended as investment advice and is not a recommendation about managing or investing your retirement savings. In providing these materials PGIM Investments is not acting as your fiduciary as defined by the Department of Labor. Please consult with a qualified investment professional if you wish to obtain investment advice.
Mutual funds are distributed by Prudential Investment Management Services LLC, a Prudential Financial company, member SIPC. Jennison Associates and PGIM, Inc. (PGIM) are registered investment advisors and Prudential Financial companies. QMA is the primary business name of Quantitative Management Associates LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of PGIM. PGIM Fixed Income and PGIM Real Estate are units of PGIM. © 2017 Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Jennison Associates, Jennison, PGIM Real Estate, the Prudential logo, and the Rock symbol are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide.
Prudential Financial, Inc. of the United States is not affiliated with Prudential plc. which is headquartered in the United Kingdom.
Investment Products: Are not insured by the FDIC or any other federal government agency, may lose value, and are not a deposit of or guaranteed by any bank or any bank affiliate.
 
0303656-00003-00 Ed. 06/2017
 









 






Back to top

















 










Capital One 360 Money Market® Page








































Please Use Javascript
JavaScript must be enabled on your browser for your web experience to work as designed or to log in to your account. Please use your browser's Help function to learn how to enable JavaScript.Learn more about JavaScript enabled browsers our sites support.

















    360 Money Market®
  










Here, savings don't just grow. They break through.







        With 360 Money Market®, an online & mobile account from Capital One®, you'll earn up to % Annual Percentage Yield. That's one of the nation's best savings rates.
      






      
        Open Now
      
    







Strong savings. Enduring growth.





One of the nation's top rates
Earn % APY on balances of  or more. (Balances of less than  will still earn a great everyday rate of % APY.)





No fees, all growth
With no fees, your money stays on the rise.





Safe and secure
FDIC insurance* and fraud coverage will keep your savings secure.







Give your money the upward push it deserves with 360 Money Market®.






      
        Open Now
      
    









Questions? Give us a buzz at 1-800-289-1992 to talk to a real person (8 a.m. - 8 p.m., 7 days a week).
Advertised rates are variable and effective . The % Annual Percentage Yield (APY) applies to the entire account balance for accounts with balances of  or more; a % APY applies to the entire account balance for accounts with balances less than .
360 Money Market accounts do not have debit cards or check writing capabilities. Money market and savings accounts are subject to statement cycle transaction limits.
We use the daily collected balance method to calculate interest on the account. This method applies a daily periodic rate to the principal in the account each day.
There is no monthly cycle service charge for this account, and no minimum balance requirement to open or maintain the account.
National average for money market and savings accounts at top 50 banks by deposits based on balances of $1 as of 03/23/2017, Informa Research Services, Calabasas, CA, www.informars.com. Although the information has been obtained from various institutions, the accuracy cannot be guaranteed.
Web access is needed to use Mobile Banking. Check with your service provider for details on specific fees and charges.
*Please see www.fdic.gov for additional information.
Products and services offered by Capital One, N.A., Member FDIC.
© 2017 Capital One. Capital One is a federally registered service trademark. All rights reserved.








Products
Expand Products Menu


Personal Credit Cards


Business Credit Cards


Personal Banking


Small Business Banking


Commercial Banking


Home Loans


Home Equity Lines


Auto Loans


Investing


Canada


UK



About Us
Expand About Us Menu


About Capital One


Diversity & Inclusion


Financial Education


Investing for Good


Investors


Press



Careers
Expand Careers Menu


Search Jobs



Legal
Expand Legal Menu


Servicemembers Civil Relief Act


Patriot Act Cert


Subpoena Policy


ING Trademark Disclaimer


Additional Disclosures




Contact Us


Privacy


Security


Terms & Conditions


Accessibility





Twitter
Facebook
YouTube
Linked In
Instagram





Capital One
©2016 Capital One


Member FDIC
Equal Housing Lender

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














prudential money market - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










Money Market Fund - Government Money Market Fund.



Ad
 ·
Reference.com/​Money Market Fund



Government Money Market Fund. Search Our Easy-To-Read Articles.





Browse Education



Browse Finance




Browse Health



Browse Vehicles





Top 5 Money Markets 2017 - Compare and Invest in the Best



Ad
 ·
www.ratecatcher.com/​Money-Market/​Interest-Rates



Highest Fee Free FDIC Savings Rates. Compare Top Banks. Updated Daily.




Money Market Accts - Search for Money Market Accts.



Ad
 ·
About.com/​Money Market Accts



Search for Money Market Accts. Find Expert Advice on About.com.





High Yield Money Market



Best Money Market Rates





Prudential stock price today - Check this out immediately



Ad
 ·
search.gmx.net/​Prudential Stock Price Today/​Look no further



Find the perfect Prudential Stock Price Today on Search.gmx.net





Consult Finances



Read the News



Find a Job



Experience Automobiles





Searches related toprudential money market



prudential money market account


icici prudential money market fund


prudential institutional money market ...


prudential government money market fund



prudential core fund income cif


prudential financial funds


money market fund nav


pbmxx




Web Results

Prudential Core Taxable Money Market Fund Holdings ...

https://investment.prudential.com/wps/portal/pipub/!ut/p/b0/Jcu9...


Consider a fund's investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. The prospectus and the summary prospectus contain this and other ...


Investing in Mutual Funds | Prudential.com

www.prudential.com/view/page/public/12509?param=12590&id=8


Money market mutual funds seek to maintain a stable share price; however, their yields may fluctuate. ... Prudential, the Prudential logo, ...


PBMXX Fund - Prudential Government Money Market Fund;A ...

www.marketwatch.com/investing/fund/PBMXX


Mutual fund overview for Prudential Government Money Market Fund;A (PBMXX), from MarketWatch.


PSF Government Money Market Portfolio

www3.prudential.com/personal/subaccounts/peszz1101.pdf


PSF Government Money Market Portfolio Prudential Series Fund as of 1Q 2017 Key Fund Facts Investment Advisor PGIM Investments LLC Share Class Class I


Daily Money Market Yields - Prudential Financial

www.prudential.com/view/page/public/15054


Skip to Main Content. Prudential Home Customer Support. Search


PRUMMRB Quote - ICICI Prudential Money Market Fund ...

https://www.bloomberg.com/quote/PRUMMRB:IN


Performance charts for ICICI Prudential Money Market Fund (PRUMMRB) including intraday, historical and comparison charts, technical analysis and trend lines.


Prudential Money Market Fund - Bloomberg.com

https://www.bloomberg.com/quote/PRUMONB:SJ


Performance charts for Prudential Money Market Fund (PRUMONB - Type MMF) including intraday, historical and comparison charts, technical analysis and trend lines.


Fund Profile (Open-End Funds) - Prudential Investments

https://investment.prudential.com/wps/portal/pipub/!ut/p/b0/XY3...


Open-End Funds Fact Sheets ... Money Market Credit Quality is calculated using both Moody's and S&P rating agencies. ... and Lipper Inc. PGIM is a Prudential ...


MJAXX Prudential Government Money Market Fund Class ...

financials.morningstar.com/money-market/quote?t=MJAXX


MJAXX Prudential Government Money Market Fund Class Exchange A Fund - NAV, yield, distribution, historical returns, news, portfolio holdings, and risk measures, as ...


ICICI Prudential Money Market Fund - Mutual Funds India

www.icicipruamc.com/.../debt-funds/icici-prudential-money-market-fund


There are times when we need our money to be easily accessible and safe, for planned or unforeseen events. We can achieve this security and liquidity by depositing ...










Money Market Fund - Government Money Market Fund.



Ad
 ·
Reference.com/​Money Market Fund



Government Money Market Fund. Search Our Easy-To-Read Articles.





Browse Education



Browse Finance




Browse Health



Browse Vehicles





Top 5 Money Markets 2017 - Compare and Invest in the Best



Ad
 ·
www.ratecatcher.com/​Money-Market/​Interest-Rates



Highest Fee Free FDIC Savings Rates. Compare Top Banks. Updated Daily.




Money Market Accts - Search for Money Market Accts.



Ad
 ·
About.com/​Money Market Accts



Search for Money Market Accts. Find Expert Advice on About.com.





High Yield Money Market



Best Money Market Rates





Prudential stock price today - Check this out immediately



Ad
 ·
search.gmx.net/​Prudential Stock Price Today/​Look no further



Find the perfect Prudential Stock Price Today on Search.gmx.net





Consult Finances



Read the News



Find a Job



Experience Automobiles




Searches related toprudential money market



prudential money market account


icici prudential money market fund


prudential institutional money market ...


prudential government money market fund



prudential core fund income cif


prudential financial funds


money market fund nav


pbmxx




12345Next






Answers







First Prudential Markets



First Prudential Markets, commonly known as "FPM" or "FPMarkets" is an Australian-based investment company that provides over-the-counter (OTC) and...

more






Money market



As money became a commodity, the money market became a component of the financial markets for assets involved in short-term borrowing, lending, buying...

more






Prudential Headquarters



Prudential Financial, as it is known today, began as The Widows and Orphans Friendly Society in 1875. For a short time it was called the Prudential...

more










prudential money market News






Prudential Sector Perform (RBC Capital Markets) 21.07.2017



Analysen Ticker - www.finanzen.net

 - Jul 21


Um Ihnen die Übersicht über die große Anzahl an Nachrichten, die jeden Tag für ein Unternehmen erscheinen, etwas zu erleichtern, haben wir den Nachrichtenfeed in folgende Kategorien aufgeteilt:...

more





Money Talks: History of market returns



Marco Island Eagle - Marco Island...

 - Jul 23


As we all know here in paradise, history doesn’t always repeat itself, at least not weather wise. We have seen cold winters, dry summers and everything in between. Although there are trends,...

more





Are money market rates worth looking into?



| Business | New York Post

 - Jul 23


Dear John, I suggest you mention to your readers the much higher yields available in money market accounts — 1.3 percent at CIT; 1.24 percent at Popular Community Bank; 1.11 percent at Everbank and...

more



















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network










	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































